<BODY DOCID=179>
Switzerland's economy, combining low
unemployment, financial stability and a large external payments
surplus, is in excellent condition and faces a satisfactory
future, the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and
Development, OECD, said.
    This reflected the success of stable and relatively tight
fiscal and monetary policies followed by the government, it
said.
    The OECD, in its annual report on Switzerland, picked out
some signs of a slowdown in activity and a slight pick-up in
inflation this year, but said these gave no cause for concern.
    The study forecast a decline in Gross Domestic Product
growth to 1.75 pct this year from an estimated two pct in 1986
and a small rise in consumer price inflation to 1.25 pct after
last year's sharp fall to 0.75 pct from 3.6 pct in 1985.
    But it said job creation should continue to absorb a modest
increase in the workforce, leaving the unemployment rate
unchanged at around one pct, the lowest in the 24-industrial
nation OECD area.
    Assuming an average exchange rate of 1.71 Swiss francs to
the dollar this year, against 1.69 in the second half of 1986,
the report forecast a 2.75 pct rise in exports and a 3.5 pct
rise in imports this year after rises of 3.25 pct and 6.5 pct
respectively in 1986.
    The faster growth of imports compared with exports this
year and last, reflecting buoyant private consumption, meant
that the contribution of the foreign payments balance to GDP
would shrink in both years.
    But "given Switzerland's large external surplus, there
should be no concern if domestic demand grows faster than
GDP...Which, if only in a small way, would contribute to
improving international balances," the OECD said.
    Real private consumption appeared to have been unusually
buoyant last year, with a 3.25 pct growth rate, after several
years of relative weakness, it noted.
    In 1987 private consumption was expected to slow somewhat
to a 2.25 pct growth rate, but should still outstrip overall
GDP, it added.
    The outlook for investment in plant and machinery remained
bright into 1987, and with capacity use at near record levels
last year there was scope for rationalisation and modernisation
in both the industry and service sectors, it said.
    As a consequence, growth in machinery and equipment
investment is likely to decelerate only slightly this year
after vigorous growth in 1986.
    But the report raised a questionmark over the prospects for
tourism and the banking industry, two major service sector
earners of foreign exchange.
    The long-term appreciation of the Swiss Franc, and the
accelerating deregulation of foreign banking markets, could
lead to a loss of international market share for both, it said.
    Particularly for the banks, "recent developments in
international financial markets give rise to the question
whether the Swiss financial system, which has shown substantial
flexibility in the past, is adapting itself at the speed
required ... To preserve its competitive position," it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=209>
France's right wing government is facing
growing pressure to modify its economic policies after revising
down its 1987 growth targets and revising up its inflation
forecasts for this year.
    Moving reluctantly into line with most private sector
forecasts the government yesterday raised its 1987 inflation
estimate a half percentage point to 2.5 per cent and cut its
economic growth estimate to between two and 2.8 per cent from a
2.8 per cent target written into the annual budget last
september.
    Finance Minister Edouard Balladur said the revised figures
would not push the government off its chosen mix of price
deregulation, budget-cutting rigour and pay restraint.
    But Trade Union leaders served immediate notice they would
push to protect the purchasing power of their members, raising
the spectre of a vicious spiral of wage and price rises.
    And bank economists contacted by Reuters said they believed
Prime Minister Jacques Chirac could be forced by slow growth
and rising unemployment to reflate the economy later this year,
perhaps in the autumn, to boost his prospects in Presidential
elections due by April 1988.
    "The outlook is more worrying than it was a few weeks ago,"
said Societe Generale economist Alain Marais. "We have the
impression it may be difficult to get even two per cent growth
this year."
    "The big question is whether the government's policy of wage
moderation will be maintained," he added.
    The government has set public sector wage rises at aboout
1.7 per cent this year, with a three per cent ceiling for rises
justified by increased productivity.
    But the head of the socialist CFDT union federation, Edmond
Maire, meeting with Chirac today, renewed union demands already
rejected by the government for indexation clauses to be built
into future pay contracts to safeguard workers against higher
prices.
    Calling the government's policies "unbalanced and unjust," he
also demanded investment incentives to boost employment. He
announced after his meeting that Chirac had told him the
government would spend two billion francs on a series of
measures to boost employment and training
    Andre Bergeron, a widely respected leader of the moderate
Force Ouvriere labour group, put similar demands to Chirac
earlier in the week while the Communist-led CGT, the largest of
France's unions, declared the defence of its members earnings
its top priority.
    But with unemployment nearing 11 per cent last month, and
still rising, government supporters and some economic analysts
said they were confident Chirac could resist union pay demands.
    "Salary indexation was ended by the previous Socialist
government and I dont think this administration is going to
reverse that," commented Michel Develle, economist at
recently-privatised Banque Paribas.
    Damaging transport and electricity strikes over Christmas
and the New Year, partly blamed by the government for higher
inflation, had undermined the unions power and popularity, he
said.
    Develle said Paribas expected inflation to rise even more
than the governments revised forecast, perhaps to 2.6 or 2.7
per cent this year against last years 2.1 per cent.
    "But that would still be an exceptional achievement
considering that for the first time since the Second World War
all french prices have been freed," he commented.
    Finance Ministry officials said that the governments
abolition of price and rent controls last year was responsible
for nearly a quarter of a 0.9 per cent surge in January living
costs.
    But they claimed it was a once-off phenomenon that should
have no knock-on impact on the rest of the year.
    Both Marais and Develle said they agreed with that, so long
as the government kept wages under control.
    Prices could rise 1.5 per cent in the first three months of
1987 and two per cent in the first half year, fractionally more
than forecast this week by the National Statistics Institute,
INSEE,  Marais said. But the second half year should be better,
he added.
    Ironically, one side effect of higher inflation could be to
help the government achieve its aim of cutting the state budget
deficit, several analysts said.
    So long as public sector wages are held down, higher Value
Added Tax receipts resulting from rising prices should offset a
loss in revenues that otherwise would result from slower than
expected growth, they said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=227>
Domestic demand is now expected to make
no contribution to Australian economic growth in fiscal
1986/87, ending June 30, while net exports will account for all
of the overall increase, Treasurer Paul Keating said here.
    However, he did not say in his speech to the Economic
Planning Advisory Council (EPAC) if the forecast 2.25 pct rise
in gross domestic product (gdp) had been revised.
    But Keating said domestic demand could fall slightly this
financial year and net export growth will provide the total
source of gdp growth.
    The August budget had forecast domestic demand would
contribute 0.75 percentage points to non-farm gdp growth of 2.5
pct while net exports would account for 1.75 points.
    Keating said the overall impact of the changed economic
parameters is welcome as it appears to have contributed to a
slightly more rapid correction in the current account deficit
than first anticipated.
    "The government initially forecast a current account deficit
for 1986/87 of 14.75 billion -- our present expectation is that
the result will be somewhat lower, around 14 billion," he said.
    Partial indicators released since the last meeting of EPAC
in December indicate that the 1986/87 budget strategy is
broadly on track, Keating said.
    "They indicate that domestic demand has been a little more
sluggish than was expected at budget time," he said.
    "On the other hand, net exports seem to be expanding by more
than expected at budget time, and this is underpinning growth
in domestic production and employment."
    Keating said it now seems likely that the 1986/87 inflation
rate will exceed the budget forecast of eight pct.
    "Nevertheless, there is likely to be a marked slowing in
inflation over coming quarters as depreciation and budgetary
effects wane," he said.
    Keating said the government expects economic growth to pick
up moderately in 1987/88 due to a further significant rise in
net exports and a very moderate but positive contribution from
private domestic demand.
    He said domestic demand growth will be due to a
strengthening in real household disposable income.
    The moderate rise in economic growth next financial year
should be sufficient to sustain employment growth at a level
broadly equivalent to that of the current fiscal year.
    "The current account deficit will continue to show
improvement in 1987/88," Keating said.
    "As the impact of the exchange rate depreciations of recent
years recede further, and given continued effective wage
restraint, inflation should moderate markedly in 1987/88," he
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=843>
French industry is failing to produce the
goods its markets need and its loss of competitiveness has left
the government little room for manoeuvre to reflate the
economy, the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and
Development said.
    With gross domestic product likely to grow only 2.1 pct
this year, the same rate as last year, unemployment could climb
to 11.5 pct of the workforce by mid-1988, from its present 10.9
pct, it said in an annual review of the French economy.
    The report said the French economy was "increasingly
ill-adapted to demand" selling goods at "uncompetitive relative
prices on both domestic and export markets."
    "France's poor export performance reflects a geographical
bias in favour of markets less dynamic than the average...
And...A substantial loss of market share...In the past 18
months," it said.
    Pointing to a likely widening of the French trade deficit
to around 2.9 billion dlrs this year from 2.4 billion in 1986,
it warned that a further depreciation of the dollar against the
franc could lead to "a (renewed) loss of competitiveness
relative not only to the United States but also to the newly
industrialised countries."
    This could result in further major losses of market share,
particularly in the non-OECD area, which accounts for almost a
quarter of French exports, it said.
    Until the competitive ability of industry improved, the
authorities would have "little scope for macroeconomic
manoeuvre, even if the unemployment situation or the need to
encourage a pickup in investment could require demand to grow
more briskly," it added.
    But rising unemployment could help to hold down wage
demands, contributing to a slowdown in inflation to around a
two pct annual rate this year and early next, the OECD said.
    Written mainly in December last year, the report took no
account of a rise in oil prices early in 1987, and a 0.9 pct
surge in January consumer prices, caused partly by the
government's deregulation of service sector tariffs.
    "We took a bet that the freeing of prices would not provoke
runaway rises, and it is not absolutely certain that bet has
been lost," one OECD official commented.
    OECD officials said the January data and a rise in oil
prices above the 15 dlrs a barrel average assumed in the
report, indicated an upward revision in the inflation forecast
to around 2.5 or three pct.
    The government last week revised its forecast up to between
2.4 and 2.5 pct from two pct, against last year's 2.1 pct.
    But the OECD backed the government's view that the
underlying trend for inflation remained downwards this year,
with a slowdown in domestic costs taking over from last year's
fall in oil and commodity prices as the chief cause of
disinflation.
    With French unit productivity costs now among the lowest in
the OECD area, the inflation differential between France and
its main trading rival, West Germany, could fall to just one
pct this year, it said.
    On the other hand, the report noted, consumer prices for
industrial goods and private services have been rising steeply
as companies built up their profits.
    "For the disinflationary process to continue , and price
competitiveness to become lastingly compatible with exchange
rate stability, it is essential that wage restraint continue,"
it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1068>
Canada's real gross domestic product,
seasonally adjusted, rose 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter of
1986, the same as the growth as in the previous quarter,
Statistics Canada said.
    That left growth for the full year at 3.1 pct, which is
down from 1985's four pct increase.
    The rise was also slightly below the 3.3 pct growth rate
Finance Minister Michael Wilson predicted for 1986 in
February's budget. He also forecast GDP would rise 2.8 pct in
1987.
    Statistics Canada said final domestic demand rose 0.6 pct
in the final three months of the year after a 1.0 pct gain in
the third quarter.
    Business investment in plant and equipment rose 0.8 pct in
the fourth quarter, partly reversing the cumulative drop of 5.8
pct in the two previous quarters.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1102>
Canada's gross domestic product, by
industry, rose a seasonally adjusted 1.2 pct in December, the
largest monthly gain since April, 1986, Statistics Canada said.
    GDP, which fell 0.2 pct in November, was 2.1 pct above the
December, 1985 level, the federal agency said.
    Output of goods producing industries rose 1.6 pct in the
month, with virtually all the growth occurring in manufacturing
and mining. Services producing industries expanded 1.0 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1272>
Canadian economic growth is expected to
slow further in 1987, but an improved the trade picture should
keep the country from recession, economists said.
    "The economy is ready for about a 2.0 pct rate of growth
over the course of 1987," said Carl Beigie, Chief Economist at
Dominion Securities Pitfield Ltd.
    Statistics Canada reported that gross domestic product,
grew 3.1 pct in 1986, the fourth year of continuous expansion,
but down from 1985's four pct.
    In the final quarter, GDP, in 1981 prices and at annualized
rates, rose a slight 0.2 pct after expanding 0.8 pct in the
third quarter.
    "Essentially it is a flat performance," said Warren Jestin,
deputy chief economist at the Bank of Nova Scotia.
    Economist Wendy Smith Cork of the brokerage Nesbitt Thomson
Bongard Inc said "it shows the economy is not moving along very
steadily, it's not a very promising number."
    "We weren't surprised, we expected to see one bad quarter
in Canada, but we don't think there will be a recession," she
added.
    The rise in GDP was below the 3.3 pct increase forecast by
Federal Finance Minister Michael Wilson in his budget last
month. He also projected the economy would expand  2.8 pct this
year.
    Many economists are less optimistic, predicting growth will
likely be in the 2.0 to 2.2 pct range.
    Statistics Canada also reported the country's trade
performance deteriorated sharply last year as the deficit in
the current account rose to a record 8.8 billion Canadian dlrs
from the previous year's shortfall of 584 mln dlrs.
    "The sharp increase in the deficit originated from
merchandise trade transactions where imports continued to
advance strongly whereas exports were virtually unchanged," the
federal agency said in a statement.
    The merchandise trade surplus was pared to 10.13 billion
dlrs in 1986 from 17.48 billion dlrs in 1985.
    But economist Cork said the expected upturn in the U.S.
economy will lead to increased demand for Canadian goods, and
help fuel the country's modest expansion. Nearly 80 pct of
Canada's exports are shipped to the U.S. each year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1611>
Turkey expects a 1986 balance of payments
deficit of 1.5 billion dlrs, well over target, but is taking
steps to improve its performance in this and other fields, Ali
Tigrel, director of economic planning at the State Planning
Organisation said.
    He told Reuters the shortfall was a direct consequence of
economic growth of nearly eight pct, up from 5.1 pct in 1985,
which he said resulted mostly from a surge in domestic demand.
    Tigrel acknowledged a need to cut inflation further after a
drop of more than 12 points to 24.6 pct in the Treasury
wholesale index last year.
    This year's target of 20 pct "might be attainable but the
economic management will have to be careful," he said.
    Tigrel, whose department produces the annual programme
which is central to the government's economic planning, said
Turkey's creditworthiness was at risk over the current account
shortfall, originally targeted at 695 mln dlrs.
    "We must alleviate the current account substantially to
sustain the creditworthiness that we have managed to secure
over the last five years," he added.
    His comment echoed last October's Organisation for Economic
Cooperation and Development report on Turkey, which said
Ankara's case for more medium-term financing on better terms
would look better if inflation were lower and the current
account deficit cut or turned into a surplus.
    "In 1987 we must reduce the rate of growth in public sector
investments, we must reduce the public sector deficit as a
percentage of GNP and we must achieve a very visible
improvement in the current account deficit," he said.
    Tigrel said a surge in public sector spending last year was
also to blame for the high deficits.
    Appropriations to government departments had been cut by
eight pct since the budget was passed in December and foreign
borrowing by municipalities had been restrained.
    "We are trying make sure that public bodies stick to the
investment programme and do not exceed their appropriations," he
said. It was hoped to bring the public sector borrowing
requirement down to five pct of GNP in 1987 from an estimated
5.6 pct in 1986.
    More modest GNP growth of five pct for 1987 was also
targeted, Tigrel said. Measures were being taken to encourage
exports, and production incentives were being considered.
    "We must try to make sure that more capacity is injected
into the Turkish economy in the coming years. The promotion
policy is geared to make sure that both foreign investment and
local private capital come more into play as far as
manufacturing capacity is concerned," Tigrel said.
    He said the process of structural adjustment of the Turkish
economy to free market policies, begun in 1980, was still under
way. Trade had been liberalised and a freer exchange rate
policy applied, but he acknowledged there was more to be done
in a country where the state still dominates industry and the
currency is only partially convertible.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1858>
Bank of Canada Governor John Crow said he
expects the Canadian economy will grow moderately in the coming
year, despite the near flat growth in the final quarter of
1986.
    "We see moderate growth," Crow told a news conference
following presentation of the central bank's annual report in
the House of Commons today.
    He said there were positive signs of growth in the economy,
particularly the drawdown of business inventories in the fourth
quarter. Yesterday, Statistics Canada reported gross domestic
product expanded a slight 0.2 pct in the quarter.
    Crow reiterated the bank's previous statements that
inflation remains a major priority in setting monetary policy
and said only zero inflation would be acceptable. Canada's
inflation rate is currently hovering around the four pct mark.
    The governor said Canada's banking system remains sound
despite recent concern about exposure by the country's banks in
debt plagued countries such as Brazil.
    "It (the debt problem) is not a happy development but I
think it can be overplayed in terms of its impact," Crow told
reporters.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1959>
The outlook for the West
German economy is relatively bright, with gross national
product expected to expand by three pct this year, Kiel
University's Institute for World Economy said.
    The GNP forecast by the institute, one of five leading
economic research bodies in West Germany, is more optimistic
than that of the other institutes, some of which have recently
reduced their GNP forecasts to between two and 2.5 pct.
    In a report the Kiel institute said West Germany's export
outlook has not deteriorated fundamentally despite the mark's
strength against the dollar and other major currencies.
    "The danger that exports will slump in 1987 appears, all in
all, limited," the report said. "On the contrary, a slight rise
in exports can be expected."
    The institute said past experience has shown West German
exporters will move to counterbalance currency factors by
cutting costs, trying to penetrate new markets and adjusting
their product ranges.
    They will be aided in 1987 by an expected slight rise in
economic growth in industrial countries. At the same time, the
decline in exports to oil producing countries looks set to slow
this year.
    West German GNP growth in 1987 will be led by renewed
advances in domestic consumption and investment spending, both
of which will in turn be buoyed by an expansionary monetary
policy, the institute said.
    However, it said the labour market would see only a slight
improvement because companies will be reluctant to hire
additional workers due to higher labour costs caused partly by
agreed reductions in working hours.
    The institute cautioned that the expansionary stance of
monetary policy in West Germany was likely to bring a marked
acceleration of inflation.
    It also warned that what it called the worldwide
synchronization of monetary policy heightened the risk of a new
global recession. It said central banks in industrialized
countries, including the Bundesbank, had followed the Federal
Reserve Board's expansionary course.
    The institute said this in turn was bound to lead
eventually to a rise in worldwide inflation and a shift in U.S.
Policy towards a more restrictive policy. Other central banks
were likely to follow suit, causing a recession that could
aggravate the debt crisis of developing countries as well as
increase protectionism around the world.
    Although Germany cannot entirely shield itself from the
negative effects of the global synchronization of monetary
policy, it should do all it can to strengthen the forces of
growth at home.
    The institute said this could be done by ensuring that
fiscal policy fosters a willingness to work and invest. Taxes
should be cut by a greater amount than currently planned, and
wage increases in 1987 and 1988 should be markedly lower than
in 1986. It also said the Bundesbank should reduce inflationary
pressures by cutting the current rate of growth in money supply
to about four pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10135>
Extracts from a report by Italy's Budget
Ministry on the country's economic development in 1986 showed
gross domestic product (GDP) 2.7 pct higher in real terms than
in 1985 but a rise in unemployment.
    GDP calculated at 1980 prices rose to 434,682 billion lire
last year from 423,064 billion in 1985. On a current prices
basis, GDP was up 11 pct, totalling 894,362 billion lire in
1986 against 805,754 billion in 1985.
     But growth was insufficient to prevent a rise in
unemployment to 11.1 pct last year from 10.3 pct in 1985, the
ministry said.
    The report said falling oil prices and the depreciation of
the dollar during 1986 had favoured oil-importing countries
such as Italy.
    These factors helped Italy cut inflation to an average 6.3
pct in 1986, down from 9.3 pct in 1985.
    They also helped a major improvement in the trade balance.
    On the basis of data recently recalculated by the national
statistics institute Istat, Italy had a trade deficit in 1986
of 3,722 billion lire, the report said. This slightly revises a
previous deficit figure of 3,717 billion issued by Istat and
compares with a negative balance of 23,085 billion for 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10289>
South Korea plans to increase the size of
its budget in 1988 by 11 to 12 pct from this year's 15,596
billion won, Economic Planning Board officials said.
    The proposed boost is based on a government forecast that
gross national product (gnp) will grow by more than 7.5 pct and
the gnp deflator by 3.5 pct in 1988, against targets of 8.0 pct
and 3.5 pct respectively this year, they said.
    Details of the 1988 budget, in which spending will match
revenue, have yet to be worked out, the officials said.
    The balanced budget in 1986 totalled 13,800.5 billion won.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10340>
Italy's gross domestic product (GDP) will
grow three pct in real terms this year and 2.7 pct in 1988,
said economic information company Data Resources Europe Inc
(DRI).
    Michel Girardin, DRI Europe's senior economist, said at a
conference that Italian GDP growth this year "will be mainly
driven by consumption and especially investment."
    Girardin said the driving force behind GDP growth next year
will shift from domestic demand to exports as a result of
expected depreciation of the lira against the major currencies.
    Italy's budget ministry said yesterday that GDP rose 2.7
pct in real terms in 1986.
    DRI forecast that inflation, which was an average 6.3 pct
in 1986, will be under five pct this year and that interest
rates should drop two pct.
    Girardin said the lira is expected to appreciate 14 pct
against the dollar this year following last year's 22 pct
appreciation. An expected German mark appreciation against the
dollar means that the lira should lose about six pct of its
value relative to the German currency, he said.
    DRI estimates that foreign demand for Italian products
should grow by a 3.2 pct this year following last year's 6.2
pct increase.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10531>
The South African Reserve Bank,
confirming previous estimates, said real gross domestic product
in the 1986 fourth quarter grew at a seasonally adjusted annual
rate of 4.7 pct versus 4.6 pct in the third quarter and 1.3 pct
in the 1985 final quarter.
    The bank, in its latest quarterly review, said the nominal
growth rate for the year did not quite reach one pct after a
1.5 pct contraction in 1985.
    But it said when the strengthening of the terms of trade is
taken into account, the real GNP in 1986 advanced by 1.5 pct
compared with a decrease of 0.5 pct in 1985.
    GDP is the total value of goods and services produced by an
economy but omits income from abroad.  GNP includes such
payments or outflows.
    The bank also said there were indications the country's
economic recovery was becoming more broadly based.
    With the exception of commerce all major sectors of the
economy contributed to the fourth quarter rise in domestic
production.
    The bank said major increases in foreign reserves were
recorded in January, February and the first half of March 1987.
Reserves rose by 1.70 billion rand during January and February.
    Total reserves in 1986 declined by 189 mln rand to 5.70
billion rand and were equivalent to about 14.5 pct of the total
annual value of import payments.
    The current account surplus amounted to 7.20 billion rand
in 1986 versus 5.90 mln the previous year.
    The bank said continuing strength of the current account
has allowed foreign reserves to be "rebuilt to more comfortable
levels."
    "This has strengthened the authorities' hands in lending
support to the exchange rate of the rand if such action were to
be called for," the bank said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10827>
Canada's gross domestic product rose 0.1
pct, seasonally adjusted, in January after gaining 1.0 pct in
December but falling 0.1 pct and 0.3 pct in November and
October, Statistics Canada said.
    January's rise, in 1981 prices, was fueled largely by a 0.5
pct gain in the goods producing sector. Output in
services-producing industries declined 0.1 pct from December's
level.
    January's level was 1.29 pct higher than the same month a
year ago.
    The federal agency said it was the second straight gain for
goods producing industries. Most of the growth occurred in
manufacturing and construction.
    Within manufacturing, strong gains were posted in the wood,
machinery, non-metallic mineral and food product groups.
Significant declines were recorded in the output of automobiles
and parts, however.
    In the services sector, increases in finance, insurance and
communication were more than offset by declines in
transportation, storage and the retail trade.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11083>
The Federal Reserve's move to easier
monetary policy, begun with four quick half-point discount rate
cuts in 1986, will likely end with a final rate drop in the
second quarter, analysts said.
    A poll of 10 economists shows most expect interest rates to
edge lower, with the Fed likely to drop its basic lending rate
from 5-1/2 pct late next quarter to help the economy.
    "The Fed is not likely to ease policy much further without
a full-blown recession," said Raymond Stone, chief financial
economist at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.
    Stone said economic data available by late June may be just
weak enough to prompt one more discount rate cut. But he said
it may only be a quarter-point drop instead of the usual half
point, to avoid hurting the dollar further.
    All of the economists agreed that the Federal Open Market
Committee tomorrow will leave Fed policy unchanged.
    The average forecast of those surveyed projects roughly
quarter-point drops by the end of June in both the Treasury
bond yield, to 7-1/2 pct, and the Federal funds rate at which
banks lend to one another, to 5-7/8 pct. Most expect the prime
lending rate at major banks to remain at 7-1/2 pct.
    Other broad predictions of the survey, relating mainly to
the April-June quarter, follow:
    - The dollar is likely to decline five to 10 pct further
against other major currencies because of a large U.S. budget
deficit and a wide, but narrowing, trade gap. Contacted after
the dollar's steep drop in the last two business days, the
economists reaffirmed this view but stressed the risk is that
the dollar will fall more, rather than less, than they expect.
    - Oil prices in the second quarter are likely to continue
trading roughly between 16 and 19 dlrs a barrel and could well
test the lower end of that range.
    - Stocks will continue to outperform bonds next quarter and
probably for all of 1987. Stocks should gain on strong
foreign demand and a modest second-half economic rise. The
outlook for bonds also is less favorable later in the year
since both inflation and interest rates may be edging up.
    - Inflation as measured by the GNP implicit price deflator
will rise to around 3.3 pct this year from 2.7 pct in 1986. The
sharp fall in the dollar to date will add to inflation, as will
a mild economic pickup in the second half of this year.
    - U.S. real gross national product, which grew at a two pct
annual rate in the 1986 second half, should expand at
respective rates of about 2.3 pct and 2.5 pct in the 1987 first
and second halves. First-quarter growth is put at a 2.4 pct
annual
rate, slowing to 2.1 pct next quarter.
    Robert Brusca of Nikko Securities Co International sees
both the strongest economy and the highest interest rates among
those surveyed. He expects real GNP, which grew at a 1.1 pct
rate in fourth-quarter 1986, to expand at a 3.3 pct rate this
quarter and 3.5 pct next quarter.
    "The economy will bounce back more strongly than many
expect," Brusca said. He said an involuntary buildup in
inventories, largely in autos, will add to first-quarter
economic growth, with consumer spending helping later.
    "We're running out of special factors to keep the economy
afloat," said Philip Braverman of Irving Securities Corp. His
interest rate and economic forecasts were among the lowest.
    Braverman said tax law changes and inventory accumulation
helped lift fourth and first quarter GNP growth, respectively.
He expects 2.5 pct first quarter growth but said that second
quarter growth could be zero or negative.
    Braverman said economic activity next quarter will suffer
from a paring of inventories, lower capital investment, slow 
government spending and less construction. Only a marginally
narrower trade deficit will add to growth.
    He sees a 7.10 pct end-of-June yield on Treasury bonds,
with Federal funds and prime rates at 5.50 and seven pct,
respectively. Nikko's Brusca projects rates of 8.25 pct for
bonds, 6.15 pct for funds and 7.75 pct for the prime rate.
    Two of the 10 economists revised rate forecasts up mildly
after the dollar's fall to 40-year lows versus the yen in past
days and news of pending U.S. trade sanctions against Japan.
    David Resler of Nomura Securities Co International Inc
raised his end-June bond yield forecast to 7.50 pct from 7.20
pct and a Fed funds rate estimate to six pct from 5.80 pct.
    Raul Nicho, president of Money Market Services Inc, lifted
his forecast of bond and Fed funds rates an eighth of a point
to eight pct for bonds and 6-1/4 pct for funds. Both Nicho and
Resler left their end-June prime rate forecast at 7-1/2 pct.
    The higher rate forecasts reflected a belief that Japanese
investors will be less eager to buy U.S. bonds because of fear
about further dollar erosion and perhaps in response to U.S.
trade sanctions. Yields may have to rise to lure other buyers.
......END-JUNE U.S. INTEREST RATE FORECASTS....
....................T-bonds..Fed funds..Prime..
Nikko Securities.....8.25......6.15......7.75..
Money Mkt Services...8.00......6.25......7.50..
Discount Corp........7.75......6.25......7.50..
Merrill Lynch........7.30......5.75......7.50..
Bankers Trust........7.25......5.50......7.50..
Wells Fargo Bank.....7.30......5.60......7.00..
Irving Securities....7.10......5.50......7.00..
Dean Witter..........7.00......5.50......7.00..
.FORECAST AVERAGE....7.50......5.875.....7.50..
.CURRENT LEVELS......7.80......6.125.....7.50..
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11191>
Finland's gross national product is
expected to rise by three pct in 1987 against two pct in 1986
and inflation will be unchanged at about 3.5 pct, the private
business survey office ETLA predicted.
    Unemployment in 1987 is put at 5.5 pct, in line with last
year, the office predicted in its regular review.
    The balance of payments would show a five billion markka
deficit in 1987, against a 4.2 billion deficit in 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11291>
The Institute for Economic Research
(WIFO) said it has cut its forecast for Austria's 1987 gross
domestic product growth to a real one pct from a two pct
forecast made last December.
    WIFO chief Helmut Kramer told a new conference that he saw
the one pct figure, which compares with 1.8 pct last year, as
the upper limit of growth. The institute had made the revision
due to poor prospects for Austrian exports, he added.
    A collapse in sales to the Eastern European and oil
producing states, combined with the effects of the dollar's
fall, mean exports overall are unlikely to rise this year.
    Kramer said domestic demand alone would fuel growth this
year. After last year's 2.8 pct rise in real incomes, private
consumption was likely to rise 2.25 pct in 1987 after 1.9 pct
in 1986, despite a present trend towards higher savings.
    Unemployment was likely to rise to almost six pct from 5.2
pct last year due to the slack economic activity.
    Kramer said the current account was likely to run a deficit
of about four billion schillings compared with a 2.6 billion
surplus recorded last year. The National Bank, Austria's
central bank, last month forecast the current account would be
roughly in balance this year.
    However, Kramer said the lower economic growth should have
no notable effect on the government's attempts to cut the
budget deficit. This year's aim of reducing the deficit to 4.9
pct of GDP from 5.1 pct in 1986 could still be achieved, he
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11327>
Australia faces a major medium term
adjustment to reduce debt and improve its economic performance,
the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development said
in its latest annual review of the Australian economy.
    It said Australia had a current external deficit of 5-3/4
pct of gross domestic product, high and rapidly rising external
debt equal to 30 pct of GDP, growing servicing costs and
inflation above nine pct, far higher than that of other OECD
countries.
    A major policy change in early 1985 helped lay the basis
for sustained non-inflationary growth and external
competitiveness had improved, but economic performance overall
had sharply deteriorated since June 1985.
    A major shift of real resources to the external sector --
about 4-1/2 pct of GDP by 1990-91 -- was required for the
economy to expand in line with potential, for employment to
grow, and for the debt/GDP ratio to stabilize, it said.
    Success depended on the setting of right policies including
tighter fiscal policy, a reduction in the public sector
borrowing requirement and on private sector behaviour.
    Looking ahead over the next 18 months, the OECD expected
economic performance to improve, partly as a result of tighter
fiscal and monetary policy, and a substantial improvement in
trade volumes.
    It said positive GDP growth of three pct might be restored,
the current external deficit could fall to some 4-1/2 pct of
GDP by the first half of next year, while inflation was
projected to decelerate to around five to 5-1/2 pct by
mid-1988.
    Continued real wage moderation was essential to maintain
the competitive edge created by the Australian dollar's
depreciation, and to maintain if not boost profit shares in
order to encourage business investment.
    The report urged Australia to broaden its export base by
developing viable and competitive service and manufacturing
industries, and not count on a recovery of commodity markets to
correct its external imbalances.
    It added Australia should reduce protection levels in
manufacturing, even though faster trade liberalisation would no
doubt hurt the most protected sectors of industry.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11356>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
said a 0.7 pct rise in February's index of leading indicators
pointed to stronger economic growth in the first half of 1987.
    In a statement commenting on the rise last month after a
0.5 pct January decline, Baldrige noted the leading index was
rising at an 8.0 pct annual rate in the six months to the end
of February.
    "Based on past relationships, that gain is consistent with
stepped up growth in real GNP during the first half of 1987,"
Baldrige said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11776>
The Bundesbank should take further
steps to reduce German interest rates to protect the mark from
further appreciation and to persuade investors to bring
long-term yields lower, Commerzbank AG &lt;CBKG.F> management
board chairman Walter Seipp said.
    But he told the bank's annual news conference this did not
mean a cut in leading interest rates, rather a reduction in
money market rates through bringing the allocation rates down
for Bundesbank securities repurchase agreements.
    "Leading interest rates are not the decisive rates," he said.
"The money market rates are the important ones."
    Seipp said the Bundesbank should move away from allocating
money market liquidity at a fixed 3.8 pct as it has in recent
tender allocations.
    An easier monetary policy would not mean a loss of
credibility for the Bundesbank in its containment of monetary
growth. A fall in short rates would make the public aware of
the high yields in bonds and lead to a longer-term capital
formation, braking the expansion of money supply.
    "Thus, you can have lower rates and also a normalisation of
monetary growth both at the same time," he added.
    Seipp said there were no grounds to paint too black a
picture of the German economy, since company profitability had
improved over recent years and domestic oriented firms were
profiting from cheaper imports because of the rise in the mark.
    Growth this year should be at least one pct, he said,
describing the downturn in production in the first months as a
false start, unrepresentative of the rest of the year.
    After an economic contraction in the first quarter, the
economy should show an uptrend in the last three. "We don't
believe that the economy has tipped over, but see it more as a
'growth dip,'" Seipp said.
    But Seipp also called for support for growth from fiscal
policy, saying the top rate of income and corporate tax should
be brought down to 49 pct. The current peak rate is 56 pct.
    The additional tax cuts brought forward to next January
were no substitute for support for growth.
    Seipp added the federal government should make "further
courageous steps to decrease the state's proportion of the
German economy and to increase its flexibility."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11789>
The economy will grow by an average
rate of 2.2 pct a year in real terms between now and the end of
1991, Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale (WestLB) said in an
annual report.
    A year ago WestLB had forecast average growth of just under
three pct for 1986-1990.
    The 1987 report said gross national product would only
expand a real 1.7 pct this year -- below previous expectations
-- because of weaker exports. Growth rates will pick up later,
however, producing a 2.2 pct increase on average for the
five-year period.
 MORE
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11795>
Turkey's Gross National Product grew an
estimated 8.0 pct in 1986 at fixed 1968 prices, compared with
5.1 pct in 1985, the State Statistics Institute said.
    Reporting full-year data, it also said Gross Domestic
Product rose 8.3 pct compared with 5.1 pct in 1985. An earlier
estimate from nine-month data put full-year GNP and GDP growth
both at 7.9 pct.
    The government's GNP growth target for 1987 is five pct,
the same level it had set for 1986.
    The institute estimated per capita GNP for 1986 at 1,116.6
dlrs, up from 1,045.3 dlrs in 1985.
    Officials blame the high 1986 GNP growth on a surge in
domestic demand stemming partly from poorly controlled
municipal expenditures in the early part of the year.
    Industry grew at 11.1 pct in real terms in 1986 compared
with 6.6 pct in 1985 while agriculture expanded 7.4 pct
compared with 2.8 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11882>
Kenya's economy will continue to expand
this year and the government will do more to encourage
investment by foreign firms and the local private sector,
Planning Minister Robert Ouko said.
    He told a news conference that the government would soon
create a special bureau to expedite processing of investment
applications by local and foreign investors.
    Praising the role of multinational companies and local
entrepreneurs in Kenya's economy, the minister promised to
maintain a close working contact with the private sector.
    The economy grew by 5.3 pct last year, up from 4.1 pct in
1985, Ouko said.
    This was owing to high prices for the country's coffee
exports, low oil prices, low inflation and rising real incomes,
he added.
    "Despite rising petroleum prices and falling coffee prices,
Kenya's economy is still expected to improve in 1987," the
planning minister said.
    "High aggregate demand arising from low inflation, trade
liberalisation and disciplined financial management are
expected to increase output in the manufacturing sector," he
said.
    Agriculture would expand significantly if favourable
weather continued and farmers responded to producer price rises
announced in February, the minister added.
    Kenyan farmers are anxiously awaiting the arrival of the
long rainy season, which is due to start about now.
    Ouko said the production of Kenya's main cash crops
increased during the second half of last year.
    Coffee deliveries to the state-run Coffee Board of Kenya
rose 17 pct and tea deliveries rose four pct during the period,
he said.
    Ouko paid tribute to the private sector for its
contribution to the economy and promised to improve government
cooperation with businessmen by maintaining regular contact
with them.
    "I wish to pay tribute to the private sector for its
contribution to the economy in 1986 and challenge it to
maintain the same spirit this year ... The manufacturing sector
grew by an estimated 5.8 pct in 1986, in line with the same
period the previous year," he said.
    Ouko said the "one stop" bureau was intended to stimulate
investment and cut the time and bureacracy currently involved
in processing applications.
    The planning minister presented a review of the Kenyan
economy during the second half of 1986 which showed inflation
falling to 4.3 pct from 10.2 a year earlier.
    This was owing to higher agricultural production and the
Kenyan shilling's relative strength against other major
currencies, the report said.
    The average exchange rate was 16.23 shillings per U.S. Dlr
last year, a fall of only 1.2 pct from 16.432 in 1985. The half
yearly report said exports increased about 30 pct in
July-December 1986, while imports rose by only six pct during
the period.
    This gave Kenya an overall balance of payments surplus of
780 mln Kenya shillings (48 mln dlrs) during the period,
compared with a 1.4 billion shilling (87 mln dlr) deficit in
the second half of 1985, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11949>
Kenya's economy will continue to expand
this year and the government will do more to encourage
investment by foreign firms and the local private sector,
Planning Minister Robert Ouko said.
    He told a news conference that the government would soon
create a special bureau to expedite processing of investment
applications by local and foreign investors.
    Praising the role of multinational companies and local
entrepreneurs in Kenya's economy, the minister promised to
maintain a close working contact with the private sector.
    The economy grew by 5.3 pct last year, up from 4.1 pct in
1985, Ouko said. This was owing to high prices for the
country's coffee exports, low oil prices, low inflation and
rising real incomes, he added.
    "Despite rising petroleum prices and falling coffee prices,
Kenya's economy is still expected to improve in 1987," the
planning minister said.
    Agriculture would expand significantly if favourable
weather continued and farmers responded to producer price rises
announced in February, the minister added.
    Kenyan farmers are anxiously awaiting the arrival of the
long rainy season, which is due to start about now.
    Ouko said the production of Kenya's main cash crops
increased during the second half of last year.
    Coffee deliveries to the state-run Coffee Board of Kenya
rose 17 pct and tea deliveries rose four pct during the period,
he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12461>
Japan's leading economic organisations
urged the Government to prepare drastic pump-priming measures
even at the cost of shelving Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's
planned tax reforms, officials involved said.
    Officials of the Federation of Economic Organisations
(Keidanren) said in a meeting with government officials the
Government should issue construction bonds as an emergency
measure to prop up the economy.
    Keidanren suggested that proceeds from sales of stocks in
the newly-privatised Nippon Telegraph and Telephone Corp should
also be used to stimulate the economy.
    Keidanren Chairman Eishiro Saito said the dollar's fall
below 150 yen would create huge unemployment and bankruptcies
that could shake the foundation of the Japanese economy.
    The Keidanren meeting coincided with a written request for
drastic reflationary measures sent to the Government by the
Japan Chamber of Commerce and Industry.
    Both organisations called for stepped-up Bank of Japan
intervention to stabilise exchange rates.
    Chamber head Noboru Gotoh told a press conference the
awaited economic package should be powerful enough to push up
Japan's Gross National Product (GNP) by about two pct.
    Gotoh said the Government could cope with the present
critical economic condition even if it put off its plan to stop
the issue of deficit-covering bonds by fiscal 1990.
    The plan to reduce the fiscal budget is a pillar of
Nakasone's fiscal reconstruction program.
  REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12576>
Bank of Spain governor Mariano Rubio said
the central bank was worried that money supply was growing too
fast, reflecting excessive internal demand in the Spanish
economy, but added that he was confident recent measures would
succeed in restricting money growth.
    In testimony to the economic commission of Congress, Rubio
said the main measure of money supply, the broad-based Liquid
Assets in Public Hands, grew at an estimated annualised rate of
17 pct in March, the same as in February.
    The bank's target range for growth in this measure in 1987
is 6.5 to 9.5 pct, compared with 11.4 pct last year.
    Rubio said he was aiming for the lower end of the range.
    He added that real GDP growth of three pct in 1986 was due
to a six pct increase in real internal demand and a three pct
real drop in the contribution of the external sector.
    The aim for 1987 was for the same real growth in GDP but a
drop in the internal contribution to 4.5 pct with the negative
component of the external sector trimmed to 1.5 pct, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12771>
Swiss inflation is likely to rise in 1987
and 1988 because of inflationary tendencies in the domestic
economy, the Centre for Economic Research of the Federal
Institute of Technology said in its spring review.
    It forecast a rise in consumer prices of two pct in 1988
compared with 1.3 pct in 1987. Low import prices in 1986 helped
to keep annual inflation down to 0.8 pct.
    The centre said that in general the outlook for the Swiss
economy in 1987 and 1988 remained favourable, despite the more
difficult international economic climate facing export
industry.
    The centre repeated its previous forecast that growth in
Swiss domestic product would slow to 2.2 pct in 1987 from 2.5
pct in 1986. It revised its forecast for 1988 GDP growth to 1.7
pct from 1.6 pct in its last autumn review.
    Domestic demand will continue to replace exports as the
motor of economic growth. Private consumption will grow by
three pct in 1987 and two pct in 1988 against 3.75 pct in 1986.
    Growth in goods exports will slow to 1.75 pct in 1987 from
2.1 pct in 1986 but pick up slightly to 2.5 pct in 1988. All
three figures are well below the Swiss average for recent
years. In 1985, for example, exports increased by 9.1 pct.
    The centre said the strength of the Swiss franc, which has
firmed sharply in recent months, would continue to put pressure
on Swiss exporters.
    It forecast that imports of goods would grow by a more
modest 4.5 pct in 1987 and 3.25 pct in 1988 than in 1986, when
import prices fell substantially and imports rose by 8.2 pct.
    Industrial production will grow by 1.6 pct in 1987 and 1.2
pct in 1988 compared with 4.2 pct in 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12788>
Spain has revised some of its main
economic targets for 1987 after studying the performance of the
economy in the first quarter, the economy ministry said in its
monthly bulletin.
    Internal demand is now forecast to rise four pct against a
previous target of 3.5 pct.
    Mariano Rubio, governor of the Bank of Spain, the central
bank, yesterday said internal demand was currently growing at
an annual rate of six pct and it had to be brought down to four
pct if the government were to meet its five pct inflation
target this year. Inflation was 8.3 pct in 1986.
    The forecast for private consumption growth remains
unchanged at three pct, although public consumption is revised
upwards to 2.5 pct from 2.0 pct.
    Growth in domestic demand will fuel imports, expected to
increase by 8.6 pct against an originally estimated 7.1 pct.
    Export growth has been revised downwards to 3.7 pct from
5.2 pct due to the peseta's continuing strength against the
dollar and slack external demand.
    Slow growth of exports and a tight rein on state spending
has lowered estimated GDP growth to three pct in 1987 from an
earlier forecast 3.5 pct. GDP grew by three pct last year.
    The economy ministry is holding its inflation forecast to
five pct, in spite of minister Carlos Solchaga's doubts last
week on whether this target could be maintained if wage
settlements continue to rise above the government's recommended
five pct ceiling.
    Unions and employers dispute the average wage increases
agreed so far this year. Trade unions calculate wage
settlements have produced average rises of 7.3 pct against 5.5
pct estimated by the employers' federation CEOE.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12986>
Portugal's Gross Domestic Product (GDP)
will grow around four pct this year, the same rate as in 1986,
according to a Bank of Portugal forecast.
    Total investment this year, the country's second as a
member of the European Community (EC), will rise nearly 10 pct,
again the same rate as last year, the central bank study said.
    It added that Portugal's current account was forecast to
show a surplus of 400 mln dlrs this year compared with 1.13
billion in 1986 and 369 mln the previous year.
    Last year's high surplus was attributed to cheaper oil and
raw materials, lower world interest rates and a weaker dollar.
    Imports by volume were forecast to grow 10 pct this year
and exports four pct compared with increases of 16.5 pct and
6.6 pct respectively in 1986, the bank said.
    The forecasts were calculated on the assumption that the
non-expansionary monetary policy carried out by the current
government would be maintained, particularly in budget spending
and income and in wage policy.
    The bank added that the 1987 forecasts were also based on
the assumption that the international economic situation and
Portugal's world trade relations would remain more or less the
same as in 1986.
    The central bank said the high rate of investment estimated
for 1986 was due to government policies and to increasing
optimism among firms whose financial situation had improved
since 1985. This tendency was expected to continue this year,
especially in the construction and public works sectors.
    Financial aid from the EC had also helped to boost
investment last year, the bank said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13258>
The U.S. economy in March improved at a
faster rate than in February, with the National Association of
Purchasing Management's composite index rising to 53.9 pct from
51.9 pct, the NAPM said.
    The first quarter average for the index also was 53.9 pct.
The NAPM said that, if this average were to continue for the
rest of 1987, it would be consistent with real gross national
product growth of about three pct.
    An index reading above 50 pct generally indicates that the
economy is in an expanding phase. One below 50 pct implies a
declining economy.
    The NAPM said the economic improvement was evident in all
of the indicators in the index except inventories, which
declined slightly.
    New orders rose sharply in March, with production also
higher. Vendor deliveries slowed, another sign that the economy
improved in March. Employment expanded for the first time since
August 1984.
    Robert Bretz, chairman of the NAPM's business survey
committee and director of materials management at Pitney Bowes
Inc &lt;PBI> said "the economy ended the first quarter with a
healthy, if not substantial improvement."
    Bretz said the sharp rise in the growth of new orders in
March assures a good beginning for the second quarter.
    Some 50 pct of the purchasing managers reported that they
were paying higher prices in March than at the end of 1986. Of
those paying higher prices now, the average increase was put at
2.5 pct.
    The estimated average price increase anticipated by members
for the remainder of 1987 is 2.1 pct. While prices continue to
rise, the NAPM said that most purchasers do not see them as
being significant.
    The composite index is a seasonally adjusted figure, based
on five components of the NAPM business survey - new orders,
production, vendor deliveries, inventories and employment.
    The monthly report is based on questions asked of
purchasing managers at 250 U.S. industrial companies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13274>
South Korea's gross national product (gnp)
is forecast to grow by nine pct in 1987, surpassing the
government's original forecast of eight pct and against a 12.5
pct rise in 1986, an Economic Planning Board report said.
    The report reviewing the country's economy in the first
three months of this year said year-on-year gnp was
provisionally estimated to have grown by about 12 pct in the
period, against a 10.5 pct growth in the same 1986 period.
    Board officials said the gnp rise in the January-March
period is due largely to increased exports, which totalled 9.34
billion dlrs against 6.9 billion a year earlier.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2197>
Leaks of a major Dutch official
economic forecast due to be published on Monday indicate
reduced economic growth and a renewed rise in unemployment this
year, political and market sources say.
    Concern over an anticipated fall in Dutch competitiveness
this year against a background of an average 2-1/2 pct wage
increase, zero inflation and a firm guilder has triggered some
calls for a change in monetary policy to help boost growth.
    But whatever the government's response, the central bank
will stick to its policy of keeping the guilder firm, they say.
    The official forecasting agency Centraal Planbureau (CPB)
publishes its 1987 outlook at the start of a week which will
also see a key parliamentary debate on government finances and
the economy.
    Merchant bank Pierson, Heldring en Pierson - in an estimate
reflecting general sentiment - said last month that Dutch
economic growth was now seen around one pct.
    Domestic consumer spending is not expected to offset the
decline in export growth caused by slowing growth in West
Germany, the main Dutch trading partner, and the lower dollar,
Pierson said in its February economic outlook.
    The latest growth forecasts are well below a 1.5 to two pct
growth figure seen by the CPB early last month and forecasts of
2.5 pct economic growth in 1987 made last September.
    The fall in unemployment is bottoming out and the
government has already admitted it will not meet its goal of
reducing unemployment by an annual 50,000 from 1986 to 1990.
    Some analysts and industry leaders have questioned central
bank policy of pegging the guilder firmly to the mark and if
necessary keeping interest rates up to support the guilder.
    Employers federation NCW chairman Fred Lempers criticised
the guilder's revaluation in line with the West German mark in
last January's European Monetary System (EMS) realignment and
expressed concern over its effect on competitiveness.
    But the employers federation VNO noted the Dutch economy
had become more competitive since 1980 and the fall of the
dollar was affecting this gain more than the EMS realignment.
    Some analysts also question the central bank's decision not
to copy the latest Bundesbank discount rate cut and instead
lower money market rates and abolish a credit quota surcharge.
    Central bank president Wim Duisenberg has defended the move
saying the bank had adjusted the rates with the most impact on
the money market, noting "the (4.5 pct) discount rate is at the
moment not the most important Dutch rate because it is already
far below the market rates."
    Central bank officials say the heavy dependence on trade of
the Dutch economy requires a stable exchange rate, and interest
rate policies serve that goal.
    Analysts noted a large capital outflow from the Netherlands
recently as foreign investments in Dutch stock are being sold
to take profits.
    Loosening the tie between the guilder and the mark would
reduce international confidence in the guilder and make it more
dificult to attract foreign capital, they said, noting Dutch
interest rates rose sharply when the guilder was not revalued
completely in line with the mark in a 1983 EMS realignment.
    Many Dutch banks have reacted favourably to the decision
not to copy the last German discount rate cut, but Pierson
warned it could actually add to uncertainty over the guilder.
    Some analysts noted friction between the Finance Ministry
and the central bank, with Finance Minister Onno Ruding having
said before the Bundesbank discount rate cut he favoured lower
Dutch rates but that the Germans should move first.
    One analyst said Ruding wanted to bring interest rates down
to reduce the government debt burden.
    A Finance Ministry spokesman said lower interest rates were
needed but denied any suggestion of conflicting views between
the ministry and the central bank. "The cabinet's policy is
steady, the guilder has to stay with the mark," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2278>
Federal Reserve Board Vice Chairman
Manuel Johnson said that maintaining price stability was
critical to achieving non-inflationary economic growth in the
world and said that progress was being made.
    "It is worth reiterating that the Federal Reserve's
promotion of price stability is critical to the successful
implementation of virtually all of the important ingredients
for growth," he told the Eastern Economic Association.
    Johnson said initial progress has been made on a variety of
fronts. "Federal Reserve monetary policy, the
Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation, the G-6 agreement, and the
Baker debt initiative for example all have moved us in the
right direction," he said. G-6 is comprised of U.S., Britain,
France, Japan, West Germany and Canada.
    On the budget deficit, Johnson said meeting precise
numerical goals was less important than a continuing commitment
toward slowing the growth of federal spending.
    There was evidence deficits as a pct of Gross National
Product were declining and would continue to drop, he said.
    But Johnson warned against reliance on inflow of foreign
capital to finance investment and the budget deficit and keep
interest rates stable.
    "This situation, however, cannot continue indefinitely.
Sooner or later progress must be made in controlling excessive
federal spending," he said.
    A disinflationary monetary policy should continue to be the
main objective of the Fed, Johnson said.
    He also said a more stable and sustainable alignment of
exchange rates was needed for long-term growth.
    On the trade deficit, Johnson warned against "quick fix"
solutions, which he identified as excessive dollar depreciation
or protectionist trade legislation.
    "What is important is that we attempt to maintain healthy
returns to capital and adopt policies encouraging genuine
economic growth," he said.
    Such an approach would finance the trade deficit but allow
for its gradual resolution over time.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2618>
Momentum in th U.S. economy may be
picking up given solid across-the board increases in the
February U.S. employment report, economists said.
    U.S. non-farm payroll employment rose 337,000 in February,
twice what the financial markets expected. This follows a
319,000 gain in January, revised down from a previously
reported 448,000 increase.
    "Even if you look at January and February together, this is
still a much stronger report than the consensus expectation in
the market," said Allan Leslie of Discount Corporation.
    Economists stressed that gains in hours worked signal much
larger gains in February U.S. production and income than
previously forecast.
    The average work week rose 0.2 hours to 35.0 hours from
34.8 hours in January. The average manufacturing work week rose
0.3 hours to 41.2 hours, the longest factory work week since
November 1966, the Commerce Department said.
    "The gains in manufacturing employment point to a very
large increase in industrial production of between 0.5 and 0.7
pct," said Joe Carson of Chemical Bank. This compares to a 0.4
pct  gain in January U.S. industrial production.
    Peter Greenbaum of Smith Barney Harris Upham and Co Inc
noted that the average wage rate increased to 8.87 dlrs an hour
in February from 8.83 dlrs in January.
    "Combined with the increase in hours worked, this means
we'll get a pretty healthy gain in personal income vis-a-vis
the wage and salary disbursement," he said.
    Greenbaum said that February U.S. personal income should
rise at least 0.5 pct after being flat in January.
    He said the February employment gains are consistent with
his firm's first quarter U.S. real gross national product
growth forecast of 3.7 pct.
    Economists agreed that the employment data were negative
for the credit markets in that they signal a healthier economy
and no easing in the Federal Reserve's monetary policy. But
most said that the market need not fear tighter policy either.
    "This report is another reason for the Fed to not consider
easing," said Ray Stone of Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Inc.  
  "It gives them more room to address the dollar situation," he
said. "If they had to nudge policy tighter, they could do so,
but it's most likely they'll sit and wait."
    "The data have not been uniform," Stone added. "Durable
goods were weak in January and now employment is strong."
    In January, U.S. durable goods orders dropped 7.5 pct,
followed by a 4.0 pct drop in U.S. factory goods orders. U.S.
retail sales fell 5.8 pct, and the U.S. merchandise trade gap
widened to 14.8 billion dlrs.
    "Things just aren't adding up," said Steve Slifer of Lehman
Goverment Securities Inc. "Consumer spending, capital spending,
goverment spending, and net exports data show very weak first
quarter GNP growth of one pct," he said.
    "The employment and production data point to a big
inventory build-up, but that's what we thought in the fourth
quarter and we only got 1.3 pct GNP growth."
    Manufacturing employment gained 50,000 after falling 15,000
in January. Economists estimated that 30,000 of the gain was
accounted for by striking workers in the steel and machinery
industries returning to work.
    Even so, some economists said that the manufacturing gains
have resulted from an improving trade outlook.
    Jason Benderly of Goldman, Sachs and Co noted that the U.S.
trade picture improved in the fourth quarter as net exports
grew at a 20 pct annual rate while the rate of increase in
imports fell to only six pct, and that it continues to improve
in the first quarter.
    "Not only the official statistics for the fourth quarter,
but evidence of a pick up in orders from overseas for paper
products, chemicals, high-tech goods, and capital goods show
that trade is improving," Benderley said.
    "The economy is moving between extremes," he said. "Some
reports are going to look bad and some good, but first quarter
GNP is going to grow in the middle at about three pct."
    A 287,000 gain in services employment comprised the greater
part of February's employment gain. Retail services employment
rose 129,000 in February, compared to a gain of 117,000 in
January, previously reported at 166,000.
    Construction employment rose a slim 2,000 in February. But
this follows a robust 113,000 gain in January, revised down
from a previously reported 142,000 gain.
    The U.S. civilian unemployment rate was unchanged in
February at 6.7 pct. This means the jobless rate has stayed at
6.7 pct for three consecutive months, the lowest reading since
March 1980, the Commerce Department noted.
    "The Federal Reserve has to be pleased with this report,"
Carson said. "This takes away the Fed's flexibility to ease,
but there's no reason to tighten. It's way too early for that."
      
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2709>
The Belgian government, which
introduced large-scale public spending reductions last year,
has been told by an International Monetary Fund team there is
scope for further cuts in 1988.
    The suggestion is contained in the preliminary conclusions
of the annual IMF consultations with Belgium on its economic
policy, a copy of which was distributed to journalists at the
weekly press conference following meetings of the cabinet.
    The IMF team also urges Belgium to adopt a firm interest
rate policy, with a particular emphasis on long-term rates.
    The team's report to the government praises last year's
spending cuts, which are due to reduce 1987 government spending
by 195 billion francs, and says 1986 saw the Belgian economy
perform "better, on a broader basis, than at any time so far in
the 1980s."
    However, it adds that with lower inflation, stabilisation
of the debt to gross national product ratio requires a much
lower budget deficit than the seven pct of GNP target the
government has set itself for 1989.
    The government's net financing requirement was 11.0 pct of
GNP in 1986.
    The report says "The most that can be afforded over the next
few years is a zero growth of real non-interest expenditure of
general Government."
    It says there is a need for a revision of the Belgian tax
system to iron out distortions and meet hopes of a reduced tax
burden but substantial progress is needed in stabilising the
debt to GNP ratio before this is possible.
    "Because of the difficulty of sustaining zero expenditure
growth and of likely growing impatience (for) tax reductions,
we feel that your position would be stronger if you could
decide on rather sharp expenditure reductions in 1988," the
report adds.
    The IMF urges a strong interest rate policy to signal the
government's determination to keep its currency strong and to
curb inflation.
    It says firmer long-term rates would slow private net
long-term capital outflows, which increased strongly in 1986.
    It also urges net repayments of foreign currency debt and
an overhaul of domestic capital markets to facilitate the
subscriptions by non-residents of government bond issues in
Belgian francs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2843>
chile's gross domestic product rose 5.7
pct last year to 18.8 billion dollars, compared to a 2.4 pct
rise in the previous year, the central bank said.
    It said initial projections were for a 4.6 pct increase in
gdp this year.
    The sectors which registered the greatest growth in 1986
were fisheries with 10 pct, agriculture at 8.7 pct, transport
and communications with 8.1 pct and industry at 8.0 pct, the
bank added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2965>
Senior officials in the West German
coalition government said tax cuts planned for next year would
be increased by 5.2 billion marks, in line with a pledge made
by Finance Minister Gerhard Stoltenberg at last month's
international monetary conference in Paris.
    Gerold Tandler, General Secretary of the Christian Social
Union Party, detailing the cuts at a news conference also
attended by officials from the Christian Democratic Union and
Free Democratic Party, said all of the additional 5.2 billion
mark reduction would represent net tax relief.
    An increase in revenue from other sources was not planned.
    The reductions will be added on to a package of tax cuts
already planned for 1988 amounting to some nine billion marks.
    Tandler said three billion marks of the extra tax relief
would be accounted for by reducing the rate of marginal
increase in income tax.
    An increase in personal tax allowances would save taxpayers
1.4 billion marks. Extra tax allowances for people whose
children are being educated would cut 300 mln marks from the
tax bill. A further 500 mln marks would be accounted for by
increasing the level of special depreciations for small- and
medium-sized companies.
    The extra fiscal measures planned for next year are part of
a general reform of the tax system which will come into effect
in 1990. Stoltenberg had said in Paris that part of this
reform, which will cut taxes by a gross 44 billion marks, would
be introduced next year, ahead of schedule.
    The West German government had come under pressure from the
United States to stimulate its economy with tax cuts. But
Stoltenberg said in a speech last night in Hamburg that, while
the economy would continue to expand this year, the rate of
growth was uncertain.
    The government said in January it was aiming for real
growth in Gross National Product this year of 2.5 pct, but some
economists have revised their predictions down to two or below.
    Stoltenberg said: "We remain on a course of expansion.
Whether (this will be) under two pct, as some people believe,
or around 2.5 pct as some others expect, or even closer to
three pct, as the Kiel World Economic Institute forecast a few
days ago, remains open at the moment."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3019>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop. The average mark/dollar rate is put at
1.80 marks this year and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate
is expected to break through the 150 yen barrier with an
average value of 150 yen in 1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper
angle of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball
rather than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fsical policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding
that if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. bonds the dollar
would collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look
"increasingly sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3024>
Dutch economic growth is slowing as a
firming guilder cuts competitiveness abroad and industries
reduce the pace of investment, the Dutch official planning
agency CPB said.
    The Centraal Planbureau, publishing its 1987 economic
outlook, said Dutch Net National Income (NNI) was expected to
grow by one pct this year, down from two pct growth recorded in
1986 and 2.5 pct in 1985 and 1984.
    Dutch Gross National Product is expected to rise to 432.20
billion guilders in 1987 in constant prices, a two pct increase
from last year's 423.95 billion.
    The CPB, forecasting an 8.5 pct increase in the value of
the guilder on a trade-weighted basis compared with 10.0 pct
last year, said the dollar was expected to trade at an average
of 2.0 guilders in 1987 compared with 2.45 guilders in 1986.
    "The higher guilder is causing a substantial fall in unit
labour costs abroad, when measured in guilder terms, while
these are rising slightly in the Netherlands," the CPB said.
    More of economic growth now depended on domestic
consumption, the CPB said, but noting that higher margins set
by domestic producers and importers mitigated the effect on
purchasing power of lower import costs and deflation.
    Consumer prices were set to fall by 1.5 pct this year, the
CPB said. Inflation was zero last year.
    Gross investment in industry was expected to grow by five
pct this year, a slowdown compared with 11.5 pct growth last
year, the CPB said.
    Exchange rate and oil price fluctuations will continue to
condition the Dutch economy in the future as it has in recent
years, the CPB said, noting a continued depressing impact of
these factors on Dutch competitiveness.
    In addition, it noted a slight rise in taxation and social
security costs to employers.
    The CPB, forecasting a rise in the budget deficit to 7.2
pct of Net National Income in 1987 from 6.3 pct last year,
urged the government to cut expenditure further to bring down
the deficit and reduce tax and social security payments in
future.
    Dutch government revenue is being depressed further by
falling income from natural gas sales in 1987, the CPB said.
    It said unemployment was expected to fall to 675,000 this
year from 710,000 last year.
    While the two pct GDP growth forecast set by the CPB is
within its latest forecast, issued last month, of 1.5 to two
pct growth, the figure is well above recent market estimates.
    Dutch merchant bank Pierson, Heldring en Pierson said in
its February economic outlook that GDP growth at constant
prices was expected to be 1.1 pct this year and market analysts
had expected the CPB's final forecast to be below its own
latest estimate.
    "It is too early to comment because I haven't seen the whole
document yet, but it would seem we are more pessimistic in some
of our estimates," a Pierson economist said.
    The CPB forecast 2.5 pct export growth in volume terms in
1987, after four pct growth last year. Excluding energy
exports, the 1987 figure would be two pct, it said.
    Imports were set to rise by 4.5 pct this year compared with
four pct in 1986 in volume terms, the CPB said.
    The balance of payments would see a sharp decline in the
surplus, to six billion guilders in 1987 compared with 12.1
billion last year, the CPB forecast.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3031>
West Germany takes "very seriously" the
recent undertaking by major industrial countries to promote
exchange rate stability around current levels, Finance Ministry
State Secretary Hans Tietmeyer said.
    Talking to journalists before a meeting of European
Community Economy and Finance Ministers here, Tietmeyer
declined to say whether the February 22 Paris accord by the
Group of Five countries plus Canada included secret agreements
for stabilising currencies.
    But he noted the official communique said the participants
agreed to cooperate closely to foster stability of exchange
rates around current levels. "We're taking this sentence very
seriously," he said.
    Tietmeyer remarked that the dollar had hardly moved against
the mark since the meeting.
    He said a slowdown in West German economic growth had been
caused by sharp exchange rate swings and that the Paris
agreement should help in this respect.
    Economics Ministry State Secretary Otto Schlecht said the
Bonn government saw no current need for measures to bolster the
economy but was paying close attention to the slower growth and
had not ruled out "appropriate and timely" action if necessary.
    Schlecht and Tietmeyer were speaking ahead of a discussion
by the EC ministers of the latest EC Commission report on the
economic situation in the 12-nation bloc.
    The Commission has sharply revised down expected German
gross national product growth this year to two pct from 3.2 pct
predicted last autumn and says Bonn has the most room of any EC
country to stimulate economic activity.
    Schlecht said the upturn in West Germany's economy slowed
in the fourth quarter of last year and the first quarter of
1987. But he said there was no cumulative downwards trend in
view that would make quick remedial action necessary.
    He said a number of favourable indicators such as high
level of investment and a good climate for consumption meant a
recovery could be expected, while exports would pick up
slightly during the course of the year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3065>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop.
    The average mark/dollar rate is put at 1.80 marks this year
and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate is expected to break
through the 150 yen barrier with an average value of 150 yen in
1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper angle
of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball rather
than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fiscal policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding that
if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. Bonds the dollar would
collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look "increasingly
sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
    However, rates of inflation will edge up in 1988 to over
the current OECD average of three pct. Non-oil commodity prices
will show a modest dollar price increase in 1988 for the first
time since 1984, the EIU said.
    After a rise of 18 pct in 1986, the dollar price of
internationally traded manufactures will go up by 8.5 pct in
1987 and by five pct in 1988, it said.
    It said OECD industrial production would rise by only 1.6
pct in 1987 after a weak 1.5 pct increase in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3246>
This year will see a pickup in U.S.
economic growth and inflation, the Shadow Open Market Committee
said in its semi-annual policy statement.
    The SOMC, a group of basically "monetarist" private
economists, said that "economic growth will accelerate in 1987
in response to powerful stimulative actions by the Federal
Reserve."
    The group said the Fed's actions have been excessive. As a
result, it said that "inflation and ultimately another
recession now loom on the horizon."
    The SOMC said that central bank policies that rely on
progressively larger swings in monetary expansion will not lead
to sustainable economic growth and stable prices.
    The group made no specific nominal forecasts of economic or
inflation growth in its policy statement. However, the
Committee at its Sunday policy-making meeting said it was
basically in accord with projections by Jerry Jordan, who is a
member of the SOMC and economist at First Interestate Bancorp.
    Jordan expects real GNP growth to be about one percentage
point higher than in the past two years. He expects consumer
prices to rise about 4-1/2 pct this year.
    The SOMC said in recent months rapid money growth has been
a principal cause of the devaluation. To avoid another costly
inflation and disinflation, the SOMC urged the Fed to "abandon
its inflationary policy and set the growth rate of the monetary
base on the path toward sustained lower inflation."
    The Fed in February said it would no longer target the
narrow M-1 money supply because the link between M-1 and
economic growth has been largely severed.

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3351>
a confidential world bank report on the
peruvian economy said the government's strategy does not offer
good prospects for medium and long-term growth and is likely to
quickly lead to inflation.
    The report, published today by an economic monthly, the
peru report, said the success of president alan garcia's
government in stimulating output last year to achieve eight pct
gross domestic product growth "represents gains in the short
term at the expense of the long."
    Government officials had no immediate comment on the
report, which advised a reduction in the overall size of the
public investment programme and greater emphasis on the
preservation of peru's export potential.
    The report said that although the government had succeeded
in cutting inflation 50 pct a year in the first half of 1985 to
under 70 pct, its stabilisation and reactivation programme was
encountering increasing difficulties.
    "an early renewal of inflationary pressures, linked to
monetary expansion, exchange rate devaluation and an easing of
price controls, appears not improbable," it added.

</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3352>
European Community finance ministers
discussed the economic outlook for the 12-nation bloc and many
said a recent gloomy forecast by the EC Commission was too
pessimistic.
    The Commission, the EC's executive authority, two weeks ago
cut its forecast for economic growth in the Community to 2.3
per cent for this year from 2.8 per cent predicted last autumn.
    It said economic prospects had been less promising over the
past few months because of a sharp fall in the value of the
dollar and a slowing of world trade -- factors which would
restrain Community exports.
    But diplomats said several member states, led by West
Germany, Britain and France, felt the forecast was too gloomy,
especially since it was drafted before a recent agreement
between the leading Western economic powers to stabilise
currencies around current levels.
    "Many delegations feel the (Commission's) report is rather
too pessimistic," said Belgian Finance Minister Mark Eyskens,
who chaired the meeting.
    The Commission, which slashed its growth forecast for West
Germany to two per cent from 3.2 per cent, has made clear it
feels Bonn has room to introduce additional measures to
stimulate its economy that would benefit the rest of Europe.
    But two top German officials, State Secretaries Otto
Schlecht and Hans Tietmeyer, told reporters Bonn saw no need at
the moment for action to bolster the EC's biggest economy.
    The diplomats said they were backed by Britain and France,
while Italy, Greece and Denmark supported the Commission's view
that Bonn should bring in new measures to aid EC growth.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3411>
A confidential World Bank report on the
Peruvian economy has said the government's strategy does not
offer good prospects for medium and long-term growth and is
likely to lead to an early renewal of inflationary pressure.
    The report, published today by the economic monthly, The
Peru Report, said the success of president Alan Garcia's
government in stimulating output last year to achieve a growth
in gross domestic product of over eight pct "represents gains in
the short term at the expense of the long."
    Government officials had no immediate comment on the
report, which advised a reduction in the overall size of the
public investment program and greater emphasis on the
preservation of Peru's export potential.
    The report said that although the government had succeeded
in cutting inflation from 250 pct a year in the first half of
1985 to under 70 pct, its stabilisation and reactivation
program was encountering rising difficulties.
    "An early renewal of inflationary pressures, linked to
monetary expansion, exchange rate devaluation and an easing of
price controls, appears not improbable," it added.
    The world bank report said the government's policies had
reduced inflation and short-term increases in consumption at
the apparent cost of price distortions, overvaluation of the
currency, balance of payments disequilibrium, reserve losses,
and sharply diminished creditworthiness.
    It said unless the government took action quickly to fix a
competitive exchange rate and control the public sector
deficit, "the higher the probability will be that the government
will eventually have to resort to drastic curtailment of
domestic demand and either sharp devaluation or still further
controls on imports in order to stem inflation and support the
balance of payments."
    It said the bank would place more emphasis on the
preservation of peru's export potential, external links and
overall economic efficiency.
    The government's incentive policies towards the mining and
petroleum sectors, among its main traditional exports,
suggested that it did not accord high priority to their
economic viability, it added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3800>
A meeting of leading politicians,
bankers and economists has forecast Austrian real gross
domestic product growth for this year at between 0.5 and 1.5
pct, a government spokesman said.
    This compared with a two pct growth forecast made by the
semi-official Institute for Economic Research (WIFO) last
December.
    Helmut Kramer, spokesman for Chancellor Franz Vranitzky,
told Reuters that the forecast had been made during the meeting
attended by Vranitzky, Finance Minister Ferdinand Lacina,
National Bank President Stefan Koren and a WIFO representative.
    Economists have been cutting growth forecasts recently
mainly due to expectations of a poor export performance this
year, notably to Eastern Europe and oil exporting states.
    Hannes Androsch, general director of
Creditanstalt-Bankverein &lt;CABV.VI>, today put 1987 GDP growth
at between one and 1.5 pct.
    Kramer also said the meeting had heard that unemployment
for the year would be above the 5.5 pct forecast, but was
unlikely to be more than six pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3838>
Austrian gross domestic product growth
for this year is likely to be between 0.5 and 1.5 pct, Helmut
Kramer, head of the semi-official Institute for Economic
Research (WIFO) said.
    This compared with a two pct growth forecast made by the
WIFO last December.
    Kramer made the forecast at a meeting today on Austria's
economic outlook also attended by Chancellor Franz Vranitzky,
Finance Minister Ferdinand Lacina and National Bank President
Stefan Koren.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4080>
Malaysia's Central Bank, Bank
Negara, said the economic outlook for 1987 is good in view of a
marked improvement in commodity and oil prices in the later
months of last year.
    It said in its latest quarterly review that real gross
domestic product averaged an annual growth of 1.1 pct over the
first nine months of last year compared with a decline of 0.1
pct in the corresponding period in 1985.
    Growth was generated mainly by the manufacturing sector, it
added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4165>
The worst may be just about over for
Japan's battered economy but economists said they do not expect
a vigorous recovery anytime soon. Japanese bank economists
polled by Reuters said the economy's 18 month-old slowdown is
likely to end in the first half of this year, helped by rising
exports, stepped-up government spending and falling prices. "The
economy will bottom out in the middle of the year," said
Sumitomo Bank Ltd chief economist, Masahiko Koido.
    Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd senior economist Susumu
Taketomi agreed. "It (the bottom) is in the offing," he said.
    But he added that the recovery will be slow. Growth in the
fiscal year beginning next month will only pick-up 2.2 pct,
from two pct in the current year, he said.
    Signs that the economy has just about weathered the worst
are increasing.
    The volume of exports in the first two months of the year
rose slightly on a year-on-year basis, after declining toward
the end of last year.
    Although this may be due to extraordinary factors such as a
sharp rise in car exports to rebuild depleted European stocks,
several economists said it could mark the beginning of a
recovery.
    Industrial production fell 0.7 pct in January, much smaller
than expected, and is forecast by the government to rise 0.3
pct in February and 2.6 pct in March. A Bank of Japan survey
released last week showed that the decline in Japanese
corporate earnings may be nearing its end.
    And the Paris currency accord last month has fostered hopes
the rapid yen rise has come to the end, they said.
    Six nations - the U.K., Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - pledged in Paris last month to stabilise
currencies around current levels.
    The yen's 40 pct climb against the dollar over the last two
years has hit the export-driven economy hard, by forcing its
companies to raise prices and lose sales in the U.S. Market.
    "The important thing is the exchange rate," Taketomi said.
    If it stabilises firms will grow more confident and raise
investment in plant and equipment, although there are no signs
of that yet, economists said.
    A stable yen would also help exporters regain some of their
competitive edge just as the U.S economy may be starting to
recover, economists said.
    Domestically, the economy may get a boost from some
loosening of the government's tight fiscal policy said Haruo
Muto, manager of national economics at the Bank of Tokyo Ltd.
    The next reading of the economy's health should come early
next week with the release of gnp figures for the last quarter,
1986.
    Most private economists expect a rise of about 0.5 pct from
the previous quarter. In the third quarter, GNP rose 0.6 pct.
    But a senior government official said the fourth quarter
figures could surprise by showing a rise of more than one point
quarter-on-quarter. But he added that would be a statistical
aberration and not a significant shift in economic activity.
    To maintain year-on-year growth of around 2.5 pct, the
economy would have had to rise about 1.2 pct in the fourth
quarter as the final quarter of 1985 was strong.
     The rise in the fourth quarter of 1985 was probably a
statistical anomaly that was repeated in the final months of
1986, the official said.
    Economists said the fourth quarter figures were also
distorted by the government's sale of gold coins in the second
half of 1986.
    Because the coins were classified as legal tender, their
purchase did not show up in the statistics on consumer
expenditure. Consumer spending also tailed off in December
because of bad weather and smaller-than-normal end-year
bonuses, they said.
    As the government had to buy back some of the coins from
retailers because they were unsold, the government's
contribution to the economy in the fourth quarter may have been
boosted, economists said.
    Taketomi said it may have received a further boost from
government buying of farm products as the domestic crop last
year was good.
    The senior government official said the fourth quarter
performance of the domestic sector was probably worse than
generally expected, while that of the external sector was
better.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4297>
Uncertainty is growing about the prospects
for the economy as orders for industry fall and companies scale
back investment plans, the German Savings Banks and Giro
Association said.
    Exporters expect foreign demand to remain weak, while
industry is less optimistic than it was, the association said
in a report.
    However, last month's agreement among the six leading
western industrialized countries to keep currencies around
present levels was expected to be a stabilizing influence for
exporters, it added.
    The banking association said the possibility of using
monetary policy to stimulate the economy should not be
overestimated.
    Another small drop in already low interest rates could not
be expected to cause any significant rise in purchases of
consumer or capital goods, it said.
    The Bundesbank's half-point cuts in the discount and
Lombard rates in January have largely exhausted the scope for
any further monetary moves, the association added.
    On Tuesday the Federal Statistics Office said gross
national product stagnated in real, seasonally and calendar
adjusted terms in the fourth quarter of 1986 compared with the
third quarter.
    The Economics Ministry, commenting on the figures, said GNP
in the 1987 first quarter was also expected to be relatively
weak.
    Bank economists have forecast the economy will either
stagnate or contract slightly in the first quarter. Official
first-quarter figures are due in early June.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4548>
Bolivia is to make a formal offer during
the next few months to buy back its 900 mln dlrs debt from
commercial banks at a discount of up to 90 pct, central bank
president Jier Nogales said.
     Nogales told Reuters in an interview the steering
committee of Bolivia's creditor banks had agreed to consider
the offer at a meeting in New York last month.
     He said the offer would be based on the value of Bolivian
paper on the international secondary debt market, where it now
trades at between 10 and 15 pct of its face value.
    Nogales said Bolivia will make a single offer to buy back
its commercial debt and banks who accepted would be paid the
discounted rate in full.
    Banks which declined the offer would be repaid over 20 to
30 years at interest rates below those fixed in the
international markets, he added.
    Bolivia has frozen payments on medium and long term loans
to commercial banks since March, 1984, and Nogales said there
would be no money available to restart traditional debt
servicing to them for some time.
     Several Latin American countries have initiated schemes to
cancel foreign debt by equity swaps or third party buy-backs,
but Bolivia would be the first country in the region to make a
formal offer to buy back all its commercial bank debt at
discounted rates.
    Nogales said practical and strategic considerations would
determine the exact timing of the offer but it would be made in
the next few months.
     He said Bolivia would not bargain with creditor banks over
the price to paid for the debt paper they hold, and would make
a single non-negotiable offer.
    He said Bolivia could not even pay interest to friendly
creditor countries, let alone commercial banks. The only
traditional way forward was to capitalise interest, which would
mean greater bank exposure in Bolivia and greater loss
provisions, he added.
    "We are confident that the banks are going to be
reasonable," Nogales said. "Now they can resolve their problems
for once and for all."
    "The most conservative ones who want a little more will
wait a year, but I don't know if the window of opportunity will
be open all the time," he added.
    Discussing the status of other parts of Bolivia's four
billion dlr foreign debt, 2.5 billion of which is owed to
governments and the rest to international agencies, Nogales
said negotiators had achieved considerable success in recent
discussions with the Paris Club.
     He said Paris Club creditors had agreed to reschedule
Bolivian debt over 10 years with five to six years grace, while
accepting that interest would not be paid until 1989. Interest
rates were being discussed on a bilateral basis under Paris
Club rules, he added.
     He said some Paris Club members had agreed to disregard
penalty interest payments and negotiations were continuing with
Argentina and Brazil, who hold 700 mln dlrs of Bolivian debt.
    He said Bolivia was continuing to service loans from
international agencies, and it expected to receive up to 400
mln dlrs in disbursements this year.
    The capital flow for loans and their servicing had changed
from a negative balance of 250 mln dlrs in 1985 to a net inflow
of 130 mln dlrs last year, he added.
    Nogales said that Bolivia's net international reserves now
stood at around 250 mln dlrs, compared to one mln dlrs in
disposable funds when the government of Victor Paz Estenssoro
took office in August, 1985.
    Nogales said inflation, which soared to over 20,000 pct a
year in the government's first month in office, was now down to
10 pct on an annualised basis from the last six months, and the
plan was that it should continue at this level.
    He said the government was also expecting at least three
pct growth in gdp this year after several years of negative
rates.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4573>
president jaime lusinchi defended the
20.3 billion dlr debt rescheduling accord his government
recently signed, saying it will open new credit flows and bring
needed foreign investment to venezuela.
    In his annual state of the nation speech, lusinchi also
said venezuela supports other latin american debtors, despite
having reached a rescheduling accord on its own.
    In the 90-minute speech to the congress, lusinchi summed up
the achievements of his administration, which took office in
february 1984. He pointed to the 3.3 pct growth in non-oil gdp
in 1986 and to a "moderate" 12 pct inflation rate.
    Lusinchi said the 20.3 billion dlr debt rescheduling signed
feb. 27 put an end to a process which had been 'the calvary of
our nation over the post four years.'
    In the refinancing accord, he said, venezuela managed to
achieve 'the most inmportant thing, which is the reopening of
financial flows from abroad, essential for the financing of
development and the (financing) of trade and investment.'
    Once all the details of the agreement are finalized, he
said, venezuela will seek new financing for the imported
components of new development projects.
    "our intention is not to continue being net exporters of
capital, but to protect our balance of payments with a flow of
capital towards venezuela," he said.
    Under the agreement signed february 27, venezuela extended
payments on the debt from 12 to 14 years, while the interest
rate was lowered from 1 y 1/8 to 7/8 of a pct over libor.
    At the same time, payments over the next three years were
lowered from 3.450 to 1.350 billion dlrs.
    Lusinchi defended the rescheduling accord against critics
who said it merely deferred the weight of payments to future
governments.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4625>
Senior U.S. Economic officials
disagree on the likelihood the government can meet its budget
deficit reduction targets.
    Beryl Sprinkel, chairman of the Council of Economic
Advisers, reiterated the Reagan Administration's opposition to
a tax increase and its pledge to reduce the deficit by cutting
spending and fostering economic growth.
    By contrast, Rudolph Penner, Director of the Congressional
Budget Office, said the budget process has broken down and the
deficit will remain close to 200 billion dlrs for fiscal 1987.
    Sprinkel told a symposium sponsored by New York University
that spending could be cut by avoiding decisions based on the
desire to influence votes and by shifting the responsibility
for local projects to state governments.
    He also suggested a line-item veto, which allows the
President to veto parts of bill without rejecting all of it, to
limit wasteful spending. Spending and taxing decisions should
be linked more closely.
    Sprinkel said the Administration still looks for 2.7 pct
growth in U.S. Real gross national product (GNP) in 1987 and
3.5 pct in 1988.
    Asked if the latest economic reports signal this rate of
economic growth is attainable, Sprinkel said, "It looks pretty
good to me. We've had two very strong employment reports."
    He also said federal reserve policy is appropriate, adding,
"It looks like they're on track."
    While further reductions are needed in the trade deficit,
Sprinkel said the lower dollar is having an impact.
    The new 1987 tax laws will not hurt the economy and the tax
reform act of 1986 significantly lowers tax rates and will
greatly increase private production incentives, he said.
    "Our estimates at the Council of Economic Advisers suggest
national net output of goods and services will permanently
increase by approximately two pct because of the long-run
consequences of tax reform," Sprinkel said. "In 1986, this would
have amounted to an increase of approximately 600 dlrs in the
income of the average American family."
    Sprinkel also argued the 1981 tax cuts were not responsible
for the large increase in the budget deficit.
    In fiscal 1986 ending September, federal spending amounted
to 23.8 pct of GNP, while federal receipts absorbed 18.5 pct of
GNP, leaving a deficit of 5.3 pct, he said.
    Sprinkel said that, compared with fiscal 1978, the 1986
federal expenditure share of GNP is 2.7 percentage points
higher and the revenue share of GNP is virtually the same.
    "Contrary to the conventional wisdom, therefore, the 1981
tax cut is not the root cause of the extraordinary budget
deficits of the past few years," Sprinkel said.
    "This tax cut merely rolled back the inflation-induced tax
increases that occurred between 1978 and 1981," he added.
    However, the Congressional Budget Office's Rudolph Penner
argued that the tax cut in 1981 was misguided.
    "Since making the big mistake in 1981 of cutting taxes
enormously without any plan to decrease spending by the
Administration or Congress, indeed with increases in defence
spending, now all the options (for reducing the budget deficit)
are unpleasant," he said.
    Penner said the tax cut resulted from the ideological
turmoil in the U.S. Caused by the "biggest sustained inflation
in our nation's history," which helped foster widespread
distrust of government.
    "The American people turned on the government with tax
revolt at the state level and new demands on the government at
the national level," Penner said.
    "But their dislike of taxes exceeded their general dislike
of spending programs. Now the correction of that 1981 mistake
demands that the system change a lot."
    Penner sees little hope the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings budget
deficit reduction targets will be met and said the deficit will
remain at roughly 200 billion dlrs this year.
    He said a budget process that sets targets arbitrarily is
not likely to succeed.
    "I feel pretty safe in saying that any process that tries to
dictate a numerical outcome from above is doomed to fail simply
because there's no ... Way to enforce it," Penner said.
    Penner questioned the methods by which the 1987 budget
deficit was cut. He said 18 to 19 billion dlrs were eliminated
by one-time measures, such as a temporary increase in taxes
related to tax reform and sales of government assets.
    "Another four billion dlrs was cut by what I call creative
timing changes, like moving the military payday from the last
day of fiscal 1987 to the first day of fiscal 1988. That saved
more than two billion dlrs," Penner said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4944>
U.S. February reports reflecting slim
gains in industrial output and moderating inflation pressures
reinforced expectations that the Federal Reserve will continue
to follow a stable course of monetary policy, economists said.
    "If you're the Fed, there's no reason to do anything," said
Steve Slifer of Lehman Government Securities Inc.
    "There are hints that GNP is picking up. On the inflation
front, all is well," he said. "Money supply is well under
control. It's an absolutely ideal situation."
    February U.S. industrial production rose 0.5 pct, slightly
less than the 0.7 pct gain the financial markets had expected.
This compared with a slim 0.1 pct rise in January's production
number, previously reported as a 0.4 pct increase.
    The February U.S. producer price index gained only 0.1 pct,
less than a 0.3-0.4 pct expected rise. This followed a 0.6 pct
rise in the PPI in January.
    "The Fed is going to look at this positively," said Allan
Leslie of Discount Corporation. "Certainly inflation is not as
bad as what Volcker (Fed Chairman) has said lately. Industrial
production growth is along the lines of what the Fed wants."
    The energy products component of PPI rose 4.0 pct in
February, after a 9.8 pct increase in January.
    "This shows that the impact of energy prices on inflation
is behind us in terms of the move from 15 dlrs to 18 dlrs per
barrel," said Maria Ramirez of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. "The
trend is still 3.5 pct in the first half of the year."
    In 1986, declining energy prices contributed to a 2.5 pct
decline in the PPI.
    Economists said that a rise in energy prices was expected,
but a sharp drop in auto prices was not. Passenger car prices
fell 3.4 pct and light truck prices dropped 1.3 pct.
    Yesterday, Federal Reserve Chairman Paul Volcker said that
a possibility of renewed inflation remains a concern in both
the financial markets and the Federal Reserve.
    "The Fed may be lowering its own inflation expectations
today," said Robert Brusca of Nikko Securities International.
    While low inflation permits the Fed to maintain an easier
monetary policy, Brusca said if import prices do not rise this
could necessitate a weaker dollar.
    "The outlook for the dollar is still up in the air," he
said. "We need inflation for U.S. producers to compete with
foreign producers."
    Brusca said prices of electronic equipment dropped 0.8 pct
in February's PPI. With many electronic goods produced
overseas, this may show that foreign producers are not raising
prices which bodes ill for U.S. competitiveness, he said.
    If further dollar declines are needed, this could diminish
overseas investment in U.S. debt, Brusca added, which might
necessitate higher interest rates and lower bond prices.
    By contrast, Slifer said imported goods prices rose 11.8
pct from first quarter 1985 to first quarter 1986 reflecting to
a large degree a 22 pct drop in the trade-weighted real value
of the dollar from February 1985 to February 1987.
    Slifer said import prices may rise further as
manufacturers' contracts put in place before the dollar dropped
to current levels expire, and new contracts are made that
reflect a weaker dollar.
    David Wyss of Data Resources Inc noted that imported
manufactured goods prices rose 8.5 pct at an annual rate in the
second half of 1986, which has contributed to rising U.S.
industrial output.
    "It's the other side of the lower dollar," Wyss said.
"Producers are beginning to find themselves more competitive
and they are increasing output."
    Wyss said that the latest data point to an average
industrial production gain of 0.3-0.4 pct in the first quarter.
"It's an encouraging sign that the manufacturing sector is
beginning to revive."
    But Stephen Roach of Morgan Stanley and Co Inc was not 
convinced that the February reports portend economic gains. He
said much of the strength came from factors that do not point
to a sustained rise in industrial output.
    Roach pointed out that stikers returning to work in farm
equipment industries helped account for a one pct rise in
February business equipment production.
    Utilities output rose 0.7 pct in February after gaining 1.2
pct in January, but Roach said it shows mostly that more energy
was produced, not that manufacturing activity gained.
    Finally, he pointed out that auto production accounted for
half of the industrial production gain as production of auto
assemblies rose to 8.3 million units at an annual rate from 7.5
million units.
    "In the first quarter, it looks like automakers are
producing at an 8.5 mln unit annual rate, but selling at
roughly a seven mln unit rate," Roach said. "The disparity
between output and sales is showing up in inventories."
    Economists pointed to sharp rise in January U.S. business
inventories as a sign that production may be outstripping
demand in the first quarter of 1987.
    January business inventories rose 0.9 pct, the largest gain
since July 1979 when inventories rose 1.7 pct, the Commerce
Department said. Business sales dropped 4.5 pct in January, the
largest monthly sales drop on record.
    Nonetheless, economists do not expect the Fed to react to
month-to-month changes. "The Fed has been standing pat for the
last seven months," Ramirez said. "They will continue to stand
pat for at least the next couple of months."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5206>
The Bank of Japan is satisfied with the
yen around its current range, a senior central bank official
told reporters.
    He said the pledge by major industrial nations in Paris
last month to cooperate to hold exchange rates around current
ranges applied in both directions, a dollar fall or a dollar
rise.
    Unilateral intervention itself cannot ensure currency
stability, but it can be useful when coordinated with other
policies and with other central banks, he said.
    The Bank of Japan is rather confident currency stability
will continue for some time, the senior bank official said, but
declined to be more specific.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told parliament on Friday
the current dollar/yen exchange rate is not necessarily
satisfactory for the Japanese economy.
    Asked what factors might destabilize the markets, the
official cited a lessening of market fear about intervention, a
completely unexpected change in the economy of Japan, the U.S.
Or West Germany, or resumption of comments by government
officials seeking to talk the dollar up or down.
    The senior bank official said he expects Japan's gross
national product (GNP) to grow three pct or slightly more in
the fiscal year beginning in April. That would be little
changed from the performance expected this year.
    Domestic demand may grow nearly four pct in 1987/88, but
the external sector will have a negative impact on GNP of
nearly one percentage point, he said.
    He said there was virtually no room for further monetary
policy action to boost the economy. The economy's performance
in the future very much depends on fiscal policy, he added.
    The central bank's monetary policy has already done its
part in stimulating the economy, the senior bank official said.
The Bank of Japan has cut its discount rate five times over the
last year and a half.
    Although the central bank does not see any imminent risk of
inflation, there could be some problems in the future, he said.
"We are sitting on a barrel of powder, but fortunately it may
still be wet," he added.
    Liquidity among private households and especially the
corporate sector has increased substantially, he said.
    The liquidity is the reason for the recent boom of stock
exchange prices, the bank official said. This inflow of funds
into the stock exchange, occurring also in other countries, may
continue, he said.
    The senior official said the Bank of Japan is hoping
Federal Reserve chairman Paul Volcker will be re-appointed when
his current term expires later this year.
    "He's a great man," the official said, adding that more and
more people expect his reappointment.
    Turning to exchange rates, the official said the
substantial drop in the dollar is beginning to have an effect
on reducing the imbalance in world trade, even though the
impact has taken longer than expected to show through. Even the
U.S. Trade position has begun to feel the impact, although so
far it has not been very strong, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5271>
The Bank of Japan is satisfied with the
yen around its current range, a senior central bank official
told reporters.
    He said the pledge by major industrial nations in Paris
last month to cooperate to hold exchange rates around current
ranges applied in both directions, a dollar fall or a dollar
rise.
    Unilateral intervention itself cannot ensure currency
stability, but it can be useful when coordinated with other
policies and with other central banks, he said.
    The Bank of Japan is rather confident currency stability
will continue for some time, the senior bank official said, but
declined to be more specific.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told parliament on Friday
the current dollar/yen exchange rate is not necessarily
satisfactory for the Japanese economy.
    Asked what factors might destabilize the markets, the
official cited a lessening of market fear about intervention, a
completely unexpected change in the economy of Japan, the U.S.
Or West Germany, or resumption of comments by government
officials seeking to talk the dollar up or down.
    The senior bank official said he expects Japan's gross
national product (GNP) to grow three pct or slightly more in
the fiscal year beginning in April. That would be little
changed from the performance expected this year.
    Domestic demand may grow nearly four pct in 1987/88, but
the external sector will have a negative impact on GNP of
nearly one percentage point, he said.
    He said there was virtually no room for further monetary
policy action to boost the economy. The economy's performance
in the future very much depends on fiscal policy, he added.
    The central bank's monetary policy has already done its
part in stimulating the economy, the senior bank official said.
The Bank of Japan has cut its discount rate five times over the
last year and a half.
    Although the central bank does not see any imminent risk of
inflation, there could be some problems in the future, he said.
"We are sitting on a barrel of powder, but fortunately it may
still be wet," he added.
    Liquidity among private households and especially the
corporate sector has increased substantially, he said.
    The liquidity is the reason for the recent boom of stock
exchange prices, the bank official said. This inflow of funds
into the stock exchange, occurring also in other countries, may
continue, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5447>
The Belgian government has lowered its
forecast for the nominal increase in gross national product in
1987 to 3.5 pct from an originally forecast 3.9 pct, Prime
Minister Wilfried Martens said in a statement to parliament.
    He said this revision, which brings government forecasts
more closely into line with those by private institutions,
takes account of an anticipated slowdown in the world economy
and international trade.
    But he said the impact on the Belgian economy will be
limited due to recent agreements on wages and working
conditions agreed by employers and unions.
    Martens did not say how much the government expected GNP to
grow in volume terms.
    However, last month the government's Planning Bureau said
it had revised its 1987 forecast for this to 0.9 pct from 2.0
pct.
    In 1986, Belgium's gross national product rose 2.15 pct in
volume terms against a 5.9 pct nominal rise.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5453>
External risks for the economy have
increased, but growth of two to 2.5 pct this year is still
possible, according to President of the West German Federation
of Banks, Hanns Christian Schroeder-Hohenwarth.
    Schroeder-Hohenwarth told a news conference the further
fall of the dollar since the start of this year and the
revaluation of the mark against European currencies meant West
German exporters were facing a "rough wind."
    However, domestic demand was continuing to rise and private
consumption in particular would support the economy, he said.
He saw good prospects for consumer industries.
    Schroeder-Hohenwarth said economic policy now had to
concentrate on strengthening this domestic growth. In this
context, he welcomed a decision by the government to increase
the scope of tax cuts due in 1988.
    He added, a planned reform of the fiscal system scheduled
for 1990, which was worked out by coalition partners this
month, was an "important step in the right direction."
    The government plans to cut corporation tax to 50 pct from
56 pct. However, Schroeder-Hohenwarth said the decision to cut
the maximum rate of income tax to only 53 pct from 56 pct was
"rather half-hearted."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5458>
Brazilian Finance Minister
Dilson Funaro said his country's foreign debt crisis could only
be solved by changes in the international financial system.
    Speaking to a business conference he said "It is not Brazil
that has to make adjustments with the IMF (International
Monetary Fund). It is the international financial community
that is taking away resources from the developing countries."
    "The crisis is not in Brazil, a country that has had the
third biggest trade surplus ...In the past two years Brazil had
remitted 24 billion dlrs in debt servicing and received only
two billion in fresh funds," he added.
    Funaro said that during his recent trip to the U.S., Europe
and Japan to explain Brazil's decision last month to suspend
interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of commercial debt, he
stressed the country's commitment to growth.
    "We need to and will make the effort (to solve the debt
problem) but we cannot make an effort that means we stop
growing," he said, adding that political and not purely
commercial solutions were needed to the debt crisis.
    Brazil, whose 108 billion dlr foreign debt is the largest
in the developing world, has been under pressure from official
and private creditors to work out an economic adjustment
program with the IMF to combat rocketing inflation and foreign
payments problems.
    President Jose Sarney's government has repeatedly refused
to approach the Fund, arguing that an IMF programme would lead
to recession. Funaro said that in his talks with creditors he
had tried to restore credibility in the country in the hope of
finding a lasting solution to the debt problem.
    "We are negotiating so that the debt question should not be
one of continuous crisis."
    To sustain internal growth Brazil would have to import more
machinery and equipment this year and export fewer raw
materials. The country was thus targetting a fall in this
year's trade surplus to 8.0 billion dlrs from 1986's 9.5
billion.
    Domestically, Funaro said economies had led to a reduction
in the public sector deficit to 2.7 pct of gross domestic
product in 1986, the lowest for many years and that this should
fall to 1.5 pct this year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5472>
Belgian Prime Minister Wilfried
Martens announced to Parliament a plan to reduce the 1987
government financing requirement by 20.6 billion francs.
    He said this will enable the requirement to be held to
419.7 billion francs, against the previous government target of
417.8 billion, or eight pct of gross national product.
    Martens said following a lowering of government estimates
of 1987 nominal GNP growth and a re-estimation by government
departments of 1987 spending, the government calculated that
unless action was taken, the requirement would exceed the
target by 22.5 billion francs.
    Martens said the plan involved raising non-fiscal receipts
by 5.8 billion francs and reducing spending by 14.3 billion.
The remaining 0.5 billion francs will be raised through
treasury operations.
    Martens said the money is being found through a series of
small economies and confirmed that it includes the raising of
two billion francs through the sale of part of the government's
50 pct holding in the gas company Distrigaz.
    Last year, the government announced a major program
designed to cut 1987 spending by 195 billion francs.
    The program was designed to get Belgium out of what the
government said was a "snowball effect" under which the
government constantly borrowed more to finance budget deficits
which were due largely to the cost of servicing and repaying
existing debt.
    In 1986, the government financing requirement is estimated
at 561 billion francs or 11.0 pct of GNP.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5783>
The Economic Planning Agency will
announce gross national product (GNP) figures for the
October/December quarter today at 1700 hrs local time (0800
gmt), Agency officials told Reuters.
    In the July/September quarter, GNP rose 0.6 pct from the
previous three months.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5805>
Japan's gross national product (GNP) rose
a real 0.8 pct in the October/December quarter after an
upwardly revised 0.7 pct increase the previous three months,
the Economic Planning Agency (EPA) said.
    The rise in the July/September quarter had originally been
put at 0.6 pct. The annualized growth rate accelerated to 3.2
pct in October/December from 3.0 pct in July/September.
    In the 1986 calendar year, GNP rose 2.5 pct, after a 4.7
pct increase in 1985. Last year's performance was the worst
since 1974, when GNP fell 1.4 pct. Agency officials blamed the
strong yen for depressing exports and manufacturing industry.
    In nominal terms, GNP rose 0.5 pct in the October/December
quarter, reflecting stable prices, after a one pct increase in
the previous three months, the Agency said.
    Domestic real demand increased 0.6 pct in October/December,
after a one pct rise the previous quarter.
    Domestic demand contributed 0.5 percentage point to real
GNP growth in October/December, while foreign trade added 0.2.
The figures do not tally exactly due to rounding.
    In July/September, domestic demand contributed one
percentage point to GNP growth while foreign trade knocked off
0.3 point.
    Of the 0.2 point contribution of foreign trade to GNP last
quarter, falling exports knocked off 0.2 while falling imports
contributed 0.4 point.
    Total export volume fell 1.2 pct quarter on quarter in
October/December. Imports also fell, by 2.9 pct.
    Of the 0.5 point contribution of domestic demand to
October/December GNP growth, the private sector accounted for
0.4 point and the public sector, 0.2.
    The private sector contribution included 0.3 point for
housebuilding, 0.4 for corporate capital outlays and 0.1 for
stockbuilding. Consumer spending had a 0.4 negative impact.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5807>
The government will find it very
difficult to achieve its new gross national product (GNP)
forecast of three pct growth in the fiscal year ending March
31, Economic Planning Agency officials said.
    They made the comment to reporters after news that GNP rose
0.8 pct in the October/December quarter, after a 0.7 pct
increase the previous three months.
    For Japan to achieve three pct growth in 1986/87, GNP in
the January/March period would have to grow 2.6 pct from
October/December, the officials said. The government lowered
its GNP forecast for 1986/87 from four pct last December.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5849>
Zimbabwe's real gross domestic product
increased 0.2 pct in 1986, according to preliminary figures
published by the Central Statistical Office (CSO). This
contrasts with a rise of more than nine pct in 1985.
    The main reason for the slower rate of economic growth was
a drop in the real value of agricultural output. This declined
12 pct in 1986 following a 24 pct improvement the previous
year. Mining output fell one pct in 1986 but manufacturing
production increased 1.4 pct.
    The CSO said that at current prices GDP rose 12.7 pct to
8.2 billion Zimbabwe dlrs, but inflation, measured by the GDP
deflator, was estimated at 12.2 pct, so there was virtually no
growth in real output during 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5879>
The Japanese economy will remain sluggish
in the months ahead after turning in its worst performance for
12 years in 1986, private economists said.
    Consumer spending, a main driving force of domestic demand,
was likely to remain lacklustre although brisk housing and
business investment would help sustain the economy this year,
the economists said.
    They said they were shocked by an Economic Planning Agency
report today that private spending fell 0.7 pct in the Oct/Dec
quarter for the first time in 12 years.
    The report said Japan's gross national product rose a real
0.8 pct in Oct/Dec after a revised 0.7 pct increase in the
previous quarter.
    It said GNP growth for 1986 was a real 2.5 pct, down from
4.7 pct in 1985. Agency officials said this was the worst
performance since 1974 when GNP contracted 1.4 pct in the wake
of the first oil crisis.
    They expressed concern about the 0.7 pct decline in
consumer spending in the final quarter of 1986 but said it was
only temporary as exceptionally warm winter weather had
depressed retail sales.
    But most private economists disagreed and said consumers
were likely to remain pessimistic in coming months as they saw
their real income level off.
    "Sure, consumers may have spent less on winter clothes or
heating apparatus because of the warm winter this year, but
they have done so because they have become even more uneasy
about their future pay rises," said Shoji Saito, general manager
of Mitsui Bank's economic research division.
    He said the outlook for pay increases was gloomy because of
 falling employment in many industries, particularly those hit
hard by the yen's rise.
    Masao Suzaki, senior economist at the Bank of Tokyo, said
weakened consumer confidence was the most worrying factor.
Without brisk consumer spending, Japan can hardly achieve
domestically generated economic growth as the government has
put a lid on fiscal measures, he said.
    Other economists said the 0.8 pct growth registered in
Oct/Dec may have been inflated by special factors, including
exceptionally heavy spending in the public sector. Johsen
Takahashi, chief economist at Mitsubishi Research Institute,
said the 14.4 pct increase in public sector spending in Oct/Dec
resulted from an issue of gold coins.
    "This is just a one-shot spending and we can't expect that
high level of public-sector consumption in the following
quarter," Takahashi said. Agency officials said public spending
would have risen 1.1 pct in Oct/Dec without the issue, which
marked 60 years of Emperor Hirohito's reign.
    Takahashi said the economy might contract in the current
quarter given the lack of additional significant government
spending and sluggish consumer spending.
    Saito said the most effective government action would be
income tax cuts and the postponement beyond next January of a
proposed controversial sales tax.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5985>
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson, presenting his budget for fiscal 1987/88 to Parliament,
said U.K. Economic growth was forecast at three pct in calendar
1987.
    He said the Treasury expected a current account balance of
payments deficit in 1987 of 2.5 billion stg, after a 1.1
billion shortfall in 1986.
    Inflation is expected to be 4.0 pct at the end of this
year, Lawson said.
    "As I forecast in the Autumn Statement, inflation may
continue to edge up for a time, perhaps exceeding 4.5 pct by
the summer, before falling back to 4.0 pct by the end of the
year," he added.
    Turning to the Public Sector Borrowing Requirement (PSBR),
Lawson said the likely outturn for fiscal 1986/87 was 4.0
billion stg, or 1.0 pct of GDP.
    The planned PSBR for 1987/88 was set at 4.0 billion stg.
    On monetary policy, Lawson confirmed the target range for
the narrow M0 measure would be two to six pct in fiscal
1987/88.
    No explicit target was set for the broad sterling M3
aggregate, he said. "But broad money will continue to be taken
into account in assessing monetary conditions, as of course
will the exchange rate," the Chancellor told Parliament.
    Lawson said the low outturn of the PSBR in 1986/87 "is
chiefly attributable to the remarkable buoyancy of non-oil tax
revenues in general, and the corporation tax paid by an
increasingly profitable business sector in particular."
    On oil prices, Lawson said he was sticking to his earlier
assumption that North Sea crude prices will average 15 dlrs per
barrel in calendar 1987.
    He said "it is clear that the increased flow of non-oil tax
revenues, coupled with the prospective further growth of the
economy in excess of the growth of public expenditure, puts the
public finances in a very strong position."
    Lawson said the Treasury would strive to keep the PSBR at
1.0 pct of GDP in future.
    "We have reached what I judge to be the (Medium Term
Financial Strategy's) appropriate destination - a PSBR of 1.0
pct of GDP. My aim will be to keep it there over the years
ahead," Lawson said.
    "Inevitably, this greatly diminishes the scope I have this
year for reducing the burden of taxation, which of course
remains a major objective of government policy."
    "But I am sure it is right to err on the side of prudence
and caution, and to build a still firmer base for the future."
    Lawson said the time had come to strike the Exchange
Control Act from the Statute book.
    On corporation tax, he said the rate will remain unchanged
at 35 pct in 1987/88. But companies' capital gains will be
charged at the "appropriate corporation tax rate."
    He said that under the new proposed system, companies
should be able to set Advanced Capital Tax (ACT) payments
against tax on capital gains.
    "Taken together, these changes should yield 60 mln stg in
1988/89," Lawson said.
    Lawson said he will propose that all companies and building
societies be treated the same way on payment of corporation
tax, "with all liable to pay corporation tax nine months after
the end of the accounting period on which the tax is due."
    "I also propose to legislate now to pave the way for a new
method of collecting corporation tax, to be known as Pay and
File."
    This would be part of a wider programme of streamlining tax
collection, and would not come into force until the early
1990s.
    Lawson said he planned two reliefs on Petroleum Revenue Tax
(PRT). As from today, companies may elect to have up to 10 pct
of the costs of developing certain new fields set against their
(PRT) liabilities in existing fields, until the income of those
new fields exceeds the costs incurred.
    Second, there will be a new relief against PRT for spending
on research into U.K. Oil extraction that is not related to any
particular field.
    On business employment, Lawson said employers will receive
tax relief for retraining workers.
    Lawson said that in future, traders registered for Value
Added Tax (VAT) would be able to choose to account for the tax
on the basis of cash paid and received.
    Small businesses may account for VAT annually instead of
quarterly. The VAT compulsory registration period was being
extended to 30 days, he added, and VAT registration thresholds
are to be raised to 21,300 stg.
    New measures are planned to combat VAT avoidance, he added.
    The capital gains tax retirement relief limit would now be
set at 125,000 stg.
    Lawson said he proposed to change the law so that companies
in multinational groups with dual residence will no longer be
able to secure tax relief twice on the same interest payment.
The change will take effect on April 1, 1987, but "genuine
trading companies" will not be affected.
    He also planned to end the present treatment of tax credit
relief for foreign withholding tax paid on interest on bank
loans, also from April 1.
    "In future, banks will be able to offset this tax credit
only against tax on the profit on the relevant loan," he said.
    The standard rate of taxation is being reduced by two
pence, to 27 pct from 29 pct.
    Lawson reiterated the government's aim of reducing basic
taxation to 25 pence in the pound, but added "given my decision
to use the greater part of the fiscal scope I now have to
reduce the PSBR, that goal cannot be achieved in this budget."
    Small companies' corporation tax is also being reduced to
27 pct, he said.
    On the Lloyd's insurance market, Lawson said he planned to
change the tax treatment of Lloyd's syndicates, bringing it
into line with that of provisions for outstanding liabilities
made by ordinary insurance companies and of comparable
provisions made by financial traders.
    The Inland Revenue would be told to consult urgently with
Lloyd's about the details of the legislation, he said.
    "The new rules will first apply to premiums payable for the
Lloyd's account which closes on December 31 this year," Lawson
said.
 MORE
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6037>
Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson, presenting his budget for fiscal 1987/88 to parliament,
said U.K. Economic growth was forecast at three pct in calendar
1987.
    He said the Treasury expected a current account balance of
payments deficit in 1987 of 2.5 billion stg, after a 1.1
billion shortfall in 1986. Inflation is expected to be 4.0 pct
at the end of 1987, he said, adding it may exceed 4.5 pct by
the summer before falling back to 4.0 pct by the end of the
year.
    The planned PSBR for 1987/88 was 4.0 billion stg unchanged
when compared with the likely outturn for fiscal 1986/87,
Lawson said.
    Although no explicit target was set for the broad sterling
M3 money supply, Lawson said broad money will continue to be
taken into account in assessing monetary conditions as well as
the exchange rate.
    The low outturn of the PSBR in 1986/87 was mainly due to
the buoyancy of non-oil tax revenues in general, and the
corporation tax paid by an increasingly profitable business
sector in particular.
    On oil prices, Lawson said he was sticking to his earlier
assumption that North Sea crude prices will average 15 dlrs per
barrel in calendar 1987. The treasury would strive to keep the
PSBR at 1.0 pct of GDP in future, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6197>
Surprisingly strong U.S. housing
statistics for February cannot be taken as an indication that
the economy is generating any momentum and are not sufficient
cause to start lifting forecasts for first quarter growth,
economists said.
    Building was boosted by two factors last month, unusually
mild weather and low mortgage rates. But economists said that
seasonal factors make it hard to assess what spur to the
economy, if any, will come from housing in coming months. And
after a steady retreat, mortgage rates seem to be near bottom.
    U.S. housing starts rose 2.6 pct in February to a
seasonally adjusted annual rate of 1.851 mln units from 1.804
mln in January. It was the highest pace for starts since April
1986.
    The rate at which permits were issued for future building
climbed 4.4 pct to a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 1.764
mln units after dropping 11.52 pct to 1.690 mln in January.
    "February's weather is usually more adverse for home
building. Because of seasonal factors it's difficult to
determine what this means for the economy down the road," said
Allan Leslie of Discount Corp.
    The housing report is seasonally-weighted to compensate for
weather-related setbacks. As a result, milder temperatures
inflate the statistics.
    Economists said that low mortgage rates also were a spur to
building last month. But several believe that rates will now
consolidate before edging up in late spring/early summer.
    "Builders are looking at current mortgage rates and saying
'Let's do it now'," said Mark Obrinsky of the U.S. League of
Savings Institutions in Washington, whose members supply much
of the financing for home building.
    But Obrinsky doubts that there is much more downward
potential for rates because he foresees higher inflation and 
some overall improvement in the U.S. economy.
    He expects rates to gain 50 to 100 basis points in early
summer from the 9.50 pct fixed rate effective in February. Last
November, fixed rate mortgages were about 10.30 pct.
    As expected, the strength in housing was concentrated in
the single-family sector. The multi-family area -- which
typically represents rental units -- remained weak due to high
vacancy rates and increased capital costs of such units
following tax law changes effective January 1.
    Single-family starts rose at a 5.6 pct annual pace to 1.317
mln units. Multi-family fell 4.1 pct to a 534,000 rate.
    "Strength in the single-family sector indicates that low
mortgage rates are doing their job. But we're probably not
looking at a great deal of growth potential," said Ward
McCarthy of Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.
    McCarthy noted that the housing report, together with
larger than expected gains in U.S. employment, industrial
output and retail sales in February, may cause some observers
to start waving "four pct GNP banners" for the first quarter.
Gross national product grew 1.3 pct in the fourth quarter.
    But McCarthy, who still expects first quarter real GNP to
come in at an annual rate of 2.5 pct or slightly above, is not
convinced that growth will pick up in future.
    "The big story is the inventory re-building that's going on
now, not all of which is intentional," he said. For example,
U.S. automakers, who are already saddled with high stocks,
produced at an annual rate of 8.3 mln units in February
compared with domestic car sales of 7.3 mln.
    Thus while inventories could contribute to GNP in the first
quarter, they may result in scaled-back production and weaker
growth in the second, he said.
    "If most of the first quarter growth is inventory building
and we cannot identify any improvement in export demand, then
there is the potential for softness in the second quarter,"
agreed Allan Leslie of Discount Corp. He is still evaluating
first quarter GNP prospects.
    Federal Reserve chairman Paul Volcker said last week that
current data do not show the worsening in trade has reversed.
    "At the same time that we are pumping up inventories in the
first quarter, we could foresee production slowing in the
second," cautioned Joe Plocek of McCarthy, Crisanti and Maffei
Inc, who expects first quarter growth of about three pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6384>
An internal report produced by the
Belgian National Bank foresees the country's gross national
product growth falling in 1987 to 1.0 pct from 2.3 pct in 1986,
the independent newspaper Le Soir said.
    A National Bank spokesman said the newspaper article was
basically correct, but that the report was produced six weeks
ago and figures were therefore to some extent out of date.
    The government's planning bureau predicted growth of 0.9
pct this year in a study published last month.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6406>
New Zealand's inflation and interest
rates should decline and the balance of payments improve
significantly in the fiscal year to the end of March 1988, the
Institute of Economic Research (NZIER) said.
    The independent institute said in its quarterly March issue
that it was also revising its fiscal 1987 real gross domestic
product (GDP) forecast to a fall of 0.5 pct against the one pct
drop forecast in December.
    Government figures show GDP grew at an annual 1.8 pct in
the quarter to September and 3.4 pct in the June quarter.
    The NZIER said the sharp improvement in the June and
September quarters was due mainly to a new tax structure and
the introduction of a 10 pct value-added goods and services tax
and is not expected to continue in the second half of 1986/87.
    The government's tight fiscal position is not expected to
change, it said.
    Annual inflation, measured by the consumer price index, is
forecast to fall to nine pct by next March from 18.2 pct in
calendar 1986, it said.
    "Falling inflation is likely to give significant scope for
reductions in nominal interest rates; real interest rates are
also expected to ease (albeit slightly) as the balance of
payments deficit and hence the call on overseas capital, falls
away," the NZIER said.
    Short-term interest rates are forecast to remain between 20
and 25 pct until the June quarter, but will decline over the
second half of 1987/88 to between 16 and 18 pct. Long-term
rates are expected to fall to between 14 and 16 pct.
    Five year government bond rates are currently 18.40 pct and
the key indicator 30-day bank bills 26.53 pct.
    The local dollar is expected to depreciate steadily in the
early part of the coming year and, by next March, reach 57.5 on
the Reserve Bank's trade weighted index, which is based on a
basket of currencies. The index now stands at around 66.4.
    "A marked improvement in the balance of payments is
forecast," the NZIER said. "The current account deficit is
expected to fall from 7.5 pct of GDP in 1985/86 to 4.5 pct in
1986/87 and 2.5 pct in 1987/88."
    The current account deficit is forecast to shrink to 1.32
billion N.Z. Dlrs in 1987/88 from 2.40 billion in 1986/87 and
3.33 billion in 1985/86.
    The 1987/88 budget deficit is forecast to be 2.8 billion
dlrs against an expected 2.9 billion dlrs in 1986/87 and 1.87
billion in 1985/86.
    This compares with the government's 1986/87 deficit figure
of 2.92 billion against an earlier forecast of 2.45 billion.
    "Conditions in the coming year are sufficiently subdued to
contribute to marked improvements in both the balance of
payments and the rate of inflation ...," the NZIER said.
    "Overall, these are significant gains for the New Zealand
economy and, if they continue to be improved upon, bode well
for future prospects."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6427>
The U.S. Gross National Product,
after removing the impact of inflation, increased at a revised
annual rate of 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter, the Commerce
Department said.
    That was down from an earlier preliminary 1.3 pct rise
estimated a month ago and down from the 2.1 pct rise in the
fourth quarter of 1985.
    The final fourth quarter revision, however, left unchanged
the previous estimate of a 2.5 pct increase in GNP for all of
1986 over 1985.
    The revised estimate for fourth quarter GNP partly
reflected a downward revision in inventories to a total
decrease of 28.5 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter, the
department said.
    The revisions also indicated personal consumption spending
decreased 2.2 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter after an
increase of 39.6 billion dlrs in the third quarter.
    Exports of goods and services rose 15.3 billion dlrs after
a decline of 9.4 billion dlrs in the third quarter. Imports
decreased 700 mln dlrs in the final quarter, in contrast to an
increase of 20.9 billion dlrs in the third quarter.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6494>
President Reagan said the 1.1 pct
U.S. economic growth rate during the final quarter of 1986
"wasn't all that bad."
    The Commerce Department said the rate of growth of the
Gross National Product in the October-December period was only
slightly less than a preliminary estimate of 1.3 pct made
earlier.
    At the same time, it said inflation, as measured by the GNP
price deflator, rose by 0.7 pct during the period.
    Asked his reaction to the GNP report during a White House
photo session, Reagan replied, "It wasn't all that bad."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6593>
The DIW economic research institute
said West German economic growth in 1987 is unlikely to reach
the 1.5 pct rate it had forecast earlier this year.
    The institute, whose forecasts are more pessimistic than
those of the other four leading German institutes, said the
economy had passed its peak in the summer of 1986, and its
prospects had dimmed significantly since the autumn.
    The DIW repeated earlier predictions that gross national
product (GNP) in the first quarter of 1987 would contract in
real, seasonally adjusted terms against the weak final quarter
of last year. 
    The DIW said that even if the economy recovers in the
remaining three quarters, it was unlikely that demand and
production would rise strongly enough to bring GNP growth up to
1.5 pct.
    Other institutes and economists have recently revised their
forecasts for German 1987 growth to around two pct.
    In a report DIW disputed arguments by other economists that
the economy was showing mixed development, with domestic demand
healthy but foreign demand weak.
    DIW said the crucial split was between weak demand for
capital goods, and strong demand for buildings and consumer
goods, not between foreign and domestic demand.
    It noted that domestic demand for capital goods had been
hit in recent months by the weakness of exports, which had
caused West German firms to scale back investment plans.
    Service industries, unlike manufacturing industry, were
continuing to do well because they relied on consumer demand,
it said.
    In a separate report the HWWA economic research institute
in Hamburg said West Germany's real trade surplus would fall
markedly this year.
    However, the nominal trade surplus would show little change
from 1986's record 112.2 billion marks because of a further
improvement in the terms of trade on average in 1987 compared
with 1986, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6621>
The DIW economic research institute
said West German economic growth in 1987 is unlikely to reach
the 1.5 pct rate it had forecast earlier this year.
    The institute, whose forecasts are more pessimistic than
those of the other four leading German institutes, said the
economy had passed its peak in the summer of 1986, and its
prospects had dimmed significantly since the autumn.
    The DIW repeated earlier predictions that gross national
product (GNP) in the first quarter of 1987 would contract in
real, seasonally adjusted terms against the weak final quarter
of last year.
           
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6758>
Brazil's Gross Domestic Product,
GDP, rose by 8.2 pct in real terms last year following an 8.3
pct increase in 1985, the Geography and Statistics Institute
said.
    In money terms this equalled 3.6 trillion Cruzados, giving
per capita GDP of 26,120 Cruzados, or 1.6 pct above the level
achieved in 1980 before the recession of 1981-1983, the
Institute said in a statement.
    Agricultural output, hit by adverse weather, fell by 7.3
pct last year led by coffee production which was 46 pct down.
    Industry grew 12.1 pct, including capital goods by 21.6 pct
and consumer goods by 20.3 pct, while services were up 8.3 pct.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6943>
Australia's seasonally adjusted real
gross domestic product (GDP) rose 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter
of 1986 after rising 0.2 pct in the third quarter, the
Statistics Bureau said.
    This compares with a 1.1 pct fall in the fourth quarter of
1985.
    Compared with the year-earlier quarter, GDP also rose 1.1
pct, the Bureau figures show.
    The annual rise compares with a 0.3 pct fall in the third
quarter compared with the 1985 third quarter and a 4.3 pct rise
in the year-earlier period, the Bureau figures show.
    Real non-farm gross product rose 0.9 pct in the fourth
quarter after zero growth in the third quarter and a 1.3 pct
fall a year earlier, making an annual rise of 0.8 pct.
    Gross farm product rose 4.3 pct compared with rises of 2.6
pct in the third quarter and 2.8 pct a year earlier, making
annual growth of 6.6 pct.
    Elements in the fourth quarter GDP rise included falls of
0.6 pct and 0.2 pct in private and government final consumption
expenditure respectively, the Bureau figures show.
    Gross fixed capital expenditure fell 0.1 pct in the quarter
while exports of goods and services rose 13.0 pct and imports
2.9 pct.
    Seasonally-adjusted expenditure on GDP at average 1979/80
prices rose to 36.67 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter from
36.26 billion in both the third quarter and the year-earlier
quarter.
    The figures are subject to revision over a long period.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6959>
The strong contribution of exports to
the growth in Australia's gross domestic product (GDP) in the
fourth quarter of 1986 was a significant and welcome feature of
the data, private economists polled by Reuters said.
    Real GDP rose 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986, after
rising 0.2 pct in the third quarter and falling 1.1 pct a year
earlier.
    Equally significant was the decline in both private and
government spending, they said.
    Exports of goods and services rose 13 pct in the fourth
quarter, while imports rose only 2.9 pct, Statistics Bureau
figures show. Consumer spending declined 0.6 pct and government
spending by 0.2.
    Bob Edgar of the Australia and New Zealand Banking Group
Ltd said the government's aim of reducing the current account
deficit by boosting exports and lowering consumption to cut
imports appeared to be working.
    However, he cautioned that care must be taken to keep
growth restrained because if it accelerated too fast imports
would increase and worsen the balance of payments.
    Andre Morony of Bankers Trust Australia Ltd added the
result was positive because growth was export-driven.
    But he said the GDP rise came as no surprise given the
growth in exports disclosed in other statistics.
    The economists' comments were echoed by Treasurer Paul
Keating in a statement issued in Canberra.
    Keating said the figures showed encouraging trends for a
reduction in the current account deficit, notably the decline
in domestic demand and the strong increase in exports.
    A further 3.5 pct fall in the terms of trade in the quarter
underscored the need to continue restraint in wages, prices and
public sector spending and borrowing to improve Australia's
competitiveness, he said.
    "It is clear that through the continued application of that
strategy Australia will make the necessary adjustments in its
external accounts and return to a more sustainable growth
pattern," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7032>
There is no question of stimulating
consumption or relying on a systematic budget deficit or other
reflationary policies to boost the French economy, sources
close to finance minister Edouard Balladur said.
    Their comments followed remarks by prime minister Jacques
Chirac's spokesman Denis Baudouin, who said on Monday ministers
were agreed on the desirability of "relaunching" the economy.
    This sparked speculation the government was preparing for a
reflationary U-turn, but the finance ministry immediately ruled
out any such move.
    The sources today said the government's policy remained one
of "recovery," or sound finances and greater efficiency.
    They said that while 8.6 billion of the 30 billion franc
revenues expected for 1987 from a sweeping privatisation
program will go to providing public companies with fresh
capital, 21.4 billion francs, or two-thirds, will go toward
paying off national debt.
    Any further privatisation revenue this year above the 30
billion would be distributed between repayment of national
internal debt and public companies in similar proportions, they
added.
    The sources said it was absurd to talk of reflation when
the country's internal debt, expected to grow by 10 pct this
year from 1,300 billion francs in 1986 was growing twice as
fast as gross domestic product.
    Nominal GDP is expected to grow by roughly five pct this
year from 5,000 billion francs last year, broadly in line with
earlier forecasts. Real GDP will grow by up to 2.5 pct.
    The sources said that with France's economic targets for
1987 roughly in line with its main trading partners, the
government had no intention of pushing the economy to grow at
an artificial pace out of step with neighbouring economies.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7222>
French gross domestic product will grow
by only 1.5 pct in real terms this year, compared with the
government's forecast of two to 2.5 pct growth, the private
Institut des Previsions Economiques et Financieres pour le
Developpement des Entreprises (IPECODE) said.
    However, it expects growth to recover next year to the 1986
level of two pct.
    IPECODE said demand and production would develop in
parallel this year, in contrast to last year when production
was unable to keep pace with the strong rise in domestic
demand, unleashing higher import demand.
    Claims on the International Monetary Fund (IMF) rose by 298
mln francs to 19.61 billion francs, due to net withdrawals in
francs by member nations, and an increase in reserves of
Special Drawing Rights (SDRs) due mainly to the repayment of
French debts.
    Its deficit with the European Monetary Cooperation Fund
(FECOM) remained unchanged in February at 33.90 billion francs.
    French household consumption, which rose by 3.1 pct last
year, is likely to grow by just 1.1 pct this year and 1.5 pct
in 1988, it added.
    Industrial investment is expected to rise by 4.3 pct this
year and 5.5 pct in 1988, down from 6.5 pct in 1986.
    Inflation, which was running at 2.1 pct at the end of 1986,
is likely to rise to 2.9 pct at the end of this year, IPECODE
said, while the government has forecast 2.5 pct.
    However, the institute said inflation would fall back to
2.5 pct at the end of 1988, "provided that real wage costs
remain within the framework of productivity rises."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7583>
Britain's gross domestic product (GDP)
on the average basis of output, expenditure and income rose by
2.6 pct in 1986 after a 3.4 pct increase a year earlier,
Central Statistical Office (CSO) preliminary figures show.
    In the fourth quarter, GDP rose 0.7 pct over the previous
quarter and was up 3.3 pct on the same 1985 quarter.
    The average estimate index, seasonally-adjusted and based
1980, was set at 114.3 in the fourth quarter of 1986 against
113.5 in the previous quarter and 110.7 in the final quarter of
1985.
    The CSO said the average GDP estimate index for 1986 as a
whole was 113.1, up 2.6 pct from 110.2 for 1985.
    On the output measure, GDP rose an upward revised
seasonally adjusted 0.3 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986 to
114.9 on the output index from 114.5 in the previous quarter,
giving a 3.2 pct rise over the fourth 1985 quarter, the CSO
figures show.
    On income-based GDP, the index in the fourth quarter rose
by 0.7 pct from the third quarter and was up 3.8 pct on the
year-ago quarter.
    The indices stood at 115.3, 114.4 and 111.0 respectively.
    Expenditure-based GDP rose 1.2 pct in the fourth quarter of
1986 from the third quarter and was up 2.9 pct from the same
1985 quarter.
    The CSO set the expenditure index at 112.9 from 111.6 in
the third quarter of 1986 and 109.8 in the final 1985 quarter.
    The year-on-year rise for expenditure GDP was 2.3 pct with
the expenditure index for the whole of 1986 set at 111.9
against 109.4 a year earlier.
    For income GDP, the year-on-year rise was 2.6 pct against
against three pct a year earlier. The ouptut GDP measure rose
2.8 pct year-on-year, down from 3.8 pct in 1985.
    The government usually considers the output measure the
most reliable way of measuring short-term GDP changes.
    It is based on output data for production industry and
partial information for the rest of the economy.
    The government had forecast that average measure GDP would
rise 2.5 pct in calendar 1986 after 3.3 pct in 1985. The budget
unveiled on Tuesday foresaw GDP growth in 1987 of three pct.
    The GDP deflator, based on expenditure at market prices,
rose 1.2 pct in the fourth quarter from the third, to give a
2.4 pct rise over fourth quarter 1985. Year-on-year, the
deflator rose 3.7 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8111>
The Development Bank of Singapore Ltd
(DBS) said Malaysia's real gross domestic product growth (gdp)
in 1987 could be 1.5 to two pct, above a budget target of one
pct.
    It said in a report that because of an economic recovery
and higher foreign exchange reserves, the Malaysian ringgit is
unlikely to face devaluation in the near future.
    The report was presented at a two-day investment conference
organised by the DBS, one of Singapore's four major banks.
    The report said rising commodity prices and the continued
expansion of the manufacturing sector coupled with rigorous
fiscal restraints and a more stable currency are grounds for
cautious optimism about the Malaysian economy.
    It forecast the ringgit will remain stable at between 2.60
and 2.70 Malaysian dlrs to the U.S. Dollar for the rest of the
year.
    But the report said the growth rate of Malaysia's external
debt remains worrying and should be controlled. It said
Malaysia's external debt totals 48 to 49 billion Malaysian dlrs
and its debt service ratio exceeds 20 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8135>
Debt among African countries
will continue to grow and their economies remain stifled unless
developed countries lower their interest rates, Nigerian Trade
Minister Samaila Mamman said.
    He told an informal General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
(GATT) meeting the widening gap between developed and
developing countries and an inequitable international economic
system were major impediments to growth in developing
countries.
    Delegates from 23 countries are attending the GATT talks in
the New Zealand resort of Taupo.
    "I wish to emphasise that the growth in the volume of the
external indebtedness of African countries reflects the full
effect of the deflationary monetary and trade policies of the
developed market economy countries," Mamman said.
    "The developed market economy countries have slowed down
output growth thereby drying up markets for the commodity
exports of African countries."
    Mamman said the World Bank estimated 35.3 billion dlrs a
year would be needed over the next five years for the African
continent to be able to achieve a gross domestic product growth
(GDP) rate of three to four pct by 1990.
    Yet at the same time Africa's debt service was estimated at
24.5 billion dlrs a year between 1986 and 1990.
    "With the best of intentions Africa cannot attain a three to
four pct GDP growth rate if the current high level of debt
persists," Mamman said. Developed countries must seek
alternatives to policies that resulted in the transfer of
resources and more indebtedness, he said.
    "The international community cannot fail to respond
positively to the collapse of the international market for
commodities ... And act quickly to stabilize demand and prices
of our commodity exports," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8153>
Japan is expected to post a 3.6 pct rise
in real gross national product in 1987/88, higher than the
official 3.5 pct target, a private economic institute said.
    The Research Institute on National Economy said in a report
the economy will start picking up in the April-June quarter,
partly because of an improvement in earnings performance and
capital spending in manufacturing industries.
    The institute assumed an average exchange rate in the year
starting April 1 of 150 yen to the dollar. It predicted the
Bank of Japan will not change the official discount rate in the
year.
    The institute forecast that Japan's exports will gradually
rise in the year in volume terms as the dollar's fall in the
past 18 months is likely to help prop up the U.S. Economy.
    Japan's trade surplus is expected to narrow slightly to
90.2 billion dlrs in 1987/88 ending March 31 from an estimated
98 billion in the current fiscal year, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8164>
Gross domestic product is expected to
grow by 4.4 pct in the year ending June 30, Finance Minister
Mohammad Syeduzzaman told reporters.
    Inflation fell to an estimated 12 pct this fiscal year from
17 pct in 1981/82, he said last night.
    The World Bank and other independent sources have said
inflation would be around 15 pct in 1986/87.
    Syeduzzaman said remittances from expatriates would rise to
600 mln dlrs this year from 425 mln in 1981/82.
    Foreign exchange reserves at end-June are projected at 680
mln dlrs compared with 105 mln in 1981/82, he said.
    Syeduzzaman said the export target has been set at 900 mln
dlrs this year against 626 mln in 1981/82. Commitments for
foreign loans and grants total more than five billion dlrs in
1986/87, against 3.54 billion five years previously, he said.
    The government's liberal industrial policy has attracted
investment commitments totalling 250 mln dlrs, he said
    Foodgrain output is estimated at 16.4 mln tonnes this year,
up from 16.12 mln in 1985/86 and 14.4 mln in 1981/82.
    Government officials have said Bangladesh must import
nearly two mln tonnes of grain annually up to 1990, when the
government expects to attain self-sufficiency in food.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8172>
French 1987 growth will probably be about
two pct, the same as last year, due to an international
environment that is less favourable than expected, Finance
Minister Edouard Balladur was quoted as saying.
    Treasury director Daniel Lebegue said last month that gross
domestic product is expected to grow by between two and 2.5 pct
this year, against an original target of 2.8 pct.
    Although in line with the latest Organisation for Economic
Cooperation and Development (OECD) estimate of 2.1 pct growth,
the forecast will be balanced by growth in investments and
exports, Balladur said in an interview with the daily Les
Echos.
    Last month Balladur said French GDP had grown by just two
pct last year, compared with an initial 1986 target of 2.5 pct
and 1.1 pct growth in 1985.
    He told Les Echos he aims to reduce the 1988 budget deficit
to 115 billion francs from this year's figure of 129 billion
and compared with a 141 billion deficit in 1985.
    He has already announced his intention of cutting the
deficit to 100 billion francs in 1989.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8173>
French gross domestic product should grow
by 2.3 pct in 1988 after two pct growth this year and 2.1 pct
in 1986, the Finance Ministry said.
    The latest forecast, prepared by the National Accounts and
Budget Commission, assumed an exchange rate of 6.20 francs to
the dollar this year and next and an average oil import price
rising to 18.9 dlrs a barrel next year from 17.4 dlrs this year
and 14.7 in 1986.
    The Commission, headed by Finance minister Edouard
Balladur, forecast a fall in consumer price inflation to two
pct year-on-year at end-1988 from 2.4 pct at end 1987 and 2.1
pct last year.
    In annual average terms inflation would fall to two pct in
1988 from 2.5 pct this year and 2.7 pct last year, it said.
    Trade should show a one billion franc annual surplus this
year and next after last year's 0.5 billion surplus, it added.
    Employment should rise by 0.1 pct a year over the next two
years while the state budget deficit should be cut to 2.2 pct
of GDP in 1988 from 2.6 pct this year and 2.9 pct in 1986.
    Other forecasts prepared by the Commission indicated a 1.8
pct 1988 rise in household purchasing power, up from 1.1 pct
this year but less than last year's 2.9 pct, and a 1.6 pct rise
in household consumption, compared with this year's 1.5 pct and
last year's 2.9 pct.
    Business investment is forecast to rise four pct a year
this year and next after 3.7 pct last year, with private sector
productive investment rising 4.9 pct in 1988 after a six pct
rise this year and 5.5 pct in 1986.
    The Ministry said updated forecasts would be prepared
before the autumn to serve as the basis for the 1988 budget,
which the government is now preparing for presentation in
September.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8347>
Sweden's Gross National Product rose
1.3 pct last year against 2.3 pct in 1985, mainly due to a
lower than forecast growth in exports and a sharp fall in total
investments, the Central Bureau of Statistics reported.
    Private consumption rose 4.1 pct during 1986 against 2.7
pct in 1985 whereas the Finance Ministry had expected an
increase of only 3.6 pct. Total investments fell 0.7 pct
against a rise of 6.3 pct in 1985. The Finance Ministry had
forecast a rise of 0.3 pct in 1986.
    Exports rose 2.1 pct last year against 2.3 pct in 1985, but
the Finance Ministry had predicted a growth of 2.8 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8453>
France's Economic and Social Council
(CES), an advisory body comprising industrialists, trade
unionists and representatives of other sectors of the French
economy, said the country's annual growth may not reach two pct
in 1987.
    French gross domestic product risks not reaching the two
pct growth registered last year, the Council said in a report
on first quarter 1987 economic activity without giving any
specific forecasts. Finance Minister Edouard Balladur was
quoted today as saying that French 1987 growth will probably be
about two pct.
    Balladur said in an interview with the financial daily Les
Echos that the country's economic growth will probably be about
the same as last year due to a less favourable international
environment.
    CES President Philippe Neeser said one of the major fears
for the French economy this year was a resurge in inflation.
    Disinflation was an absolute priority, Neeser told
journalists, adding that a failure to do this would be
extremely serious as if would be very difficult to reverse for
many years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8746>
The U.S. economy is showing some
promising signs of accelerated expansion despite the
sluggishness of the fourth quarter last year, private
economists say.
    Some of the slowness experienced in the October-December
period had been expected to spill over into the first quarter
this year, as the tax law changes that went into effect in
January slowed business and consumer spending.
    But some of the latest economic data show signs of
surprising strength in the U.S. economy, although some
economists remain cautious about the outlook.
    The Commerce Department reported today that new orders for
durable goods in February jumped by 5.7 billion dlrs, a six pct
rise, to 101.2 billion dlrs. Even excluding volatile defense
goods, durable goods orders rose a healthy 3.8 pct, the agency
said.
    The February numbers surpassed the expectations of many
financial analysts, whose predictions ranged from flat to
increases of up to five pct.
    The January/February employment statistics suggest the
Gross National Product will show a healthy rate of growth for
the first three months of this year, said Lyle Gramley, an
economist with the Mortgage Bankers Association.
    The U.S. jobless rate in February and January was 6.7 pct,
the lowest rate since March 1980. The number of new non-farm
jobs rose by 337,000 in February after a 319,000 gain in
January and a 225,000 December increase, the government said.
    The employment data suggests a GNP annual growth rate of
about three to 3.25 pct in the first quarter, said Gramley.
    Much of that will be attributed to businesses rebuilding
their inventories and is not likely to be sustained in the
second quarter, Gramley said. He expects a slowdown in the
second quarter with smaller increases in personal consumption
and government spending. He also sees residential construction
declining mostly for multi-family housing units.
    Fidelity Bank senior economist Mickey Levy said some of the
fourth quarter slowness will continue.
    Levy predicts GNP will grow at a scant 1.5 pct rate in the
first quarter of 1987, accelerate during the second quarter and
show a brisk 4.5 pct annual rate in the third quarter.
    The key to both forecasts is a marked improvement in the
U.S. trade balance which is expected because of the decline in
the dollar's value over the last year and half.
    "The improvement will be gradual and long lasting," Levy
predicted. Most of it will be through import reduction, but at
least one-third will be due to a rise in product exports as the
prices of U.S. goods become more attractive overseas.
    The Reagan administration has predicted the trade deficit,
which soared to record levels last year, will improve this year
and the U.S. economy will grow by a respectable 3.2 pct for the
year compared with a 2.5 pct rate last year.
    As part of the effort to reduce the trade deficit, the U.S.
has been pressing West Germany and Japan to stimulate their
domestic demand for goods from the U.S. and others.
    U.S. officials believe that would help take some of the
pressure off the United States whose five years of economic
growth has been the mainstay of developing countries.
    The U.S. economy provided them with a giant market for
their goods giving them a way to earn income badly needed to
service their foreign debt.
    The government last week said the U.S. economy grew at a
modest 1.1 pct annual rate during the fourth quarter.
    There were indications of improvement in the huge imbalance
between the volume of goods imported to the United States and
those shipped abroad. The report showed a rising volume of
exports corresponding to a decline in imports despite the fact
that in current dollar terms, the U.S. trade deficit worsened
during the closing three months of 1986.
    While fourth quarter economic growth was weak, corporate
profits jumped a healthy 6.1 pct during the period, the
government said. It also reported that inflation, as measured
by the GNP price deflator, remained in check, growing a
moderate 0.7 pct in the period, the lowest rise in 19 years.
    The government also reported that consumer spending, a key
element of the five year economic recovery, jumped 1.7 pct in
February, after falling two pct in January.
    The Federal Reserve Board also reported that the
manufacturing sector, which had been one of the weaker elements
of the U.S. economy, was showing signs of recovery.
    In its latest report on current economic conditions, the
Fed said that economic activity in the various regions of the
country ranged from uneven or steady to improving.
Manufacturing activity showed signs of improvement in most
regions except Dallas where orders remained sluggish.
    Chase Econometrics Chairman Lawrence Chimerine said the
pick up in the U.S. manufacturing sector is largely due to the
drop in the dollar's value. He said he does not foresee a major
pick up in economic activity, but does not believe the economy
will slip into recession either.
    He said higher prices on imported products and wage cuts
that have helped the manufacturing sector will squeeze
consumers purchasing power.
    "That pattern is starting and will continue for a number of
years," Chimerine said. He sees economic growth hovering around
a modest two pct level for the next few years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9196>
Singapore's gross domestic product
will grow six pct in the first quarter and five pct in the
second quarter this year, with further growth expected in the
second half, Trade and Industry Minister Lee Hsien Loong told
parliament.
    The figures compared with 3.4 pct contraction and 1.2 pct
growth respectively for the first and second quarters of 1986.
    The estimates were based on a tentative leading indicator
incorporating new business orders, company inventories and
share prices used by his ministry, Lee said, without giving
further details of the new indicator.
    Singapore's economy grew 1.9 pct last year, after shrinking
1.8 pct in 1985. The government has forecast growth rate of
three to four pct for 1987.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9769>
Gross domestic product (GDP)
growth in 1987 is expected to grow by between 1.5 and two pct,
up from one pct in 1986, the central bank said.
    The forecast compares with the one pct GDP growth forecast
made by the Treasury last October.
    Bank Negara also said in its annual report that gross
national product (GNP) is expected to grow by 3.5 to four pct,
after declining 7.3 pct in 1986.
    It said that a turnaround in investor confidence since last
November had been spurred by a moderate improvement in oil and
commodity prices and a rise in manufacturing exports.
    Growth in 1987 is expected to come from the anticipated
rise in export earnings if the industrialised countries sustain
their average GNP growth at 2.5 to three pct, it added.
    Bank Negara said its forecast assumes that crude oil will
average 15.50 dlrs a barrel, rubber at 210 cents a kilo, palm
oil at 850 ringgit a tonne, tin at 17 ringgit a kilo and a rise
of 12 pct in manufacturing exports.
    It said Malaysia's international terms of trade will turn
around to rise by two pct in 1987 after declining 12 pct in
1986 and five pct in 1985.
    "In 1987, income will be higher, private consumer spending
is likely to recover and expand... The budget will remain under
strict control... The resource gap in the government's finances
on current account will be bridged over the near term," Bank
Governor Jaafar Hussein said in the report.
    The current account deficit is expected to narrow to 1.19
billion ringgit in 1986 or 1.8 pct of GNP from 1.79 billion or
2.5 pct of the GNP the previous year.
    The bank forecasts the inflation rate will increase by 1.5
pct, after its 0.7 pct rise in 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
